2015-08~09
http://www.coastweek.com/3836-Kenyan-analysts-commend-impressive-China-WWII-victory-parade.htm

Coastweek - The most from the coast
By Bedah Mengo NAIROBI 
 (Xinhua) -- Kenya’s international relations experts have 
 commended China’s Victory Parade, terming it a befitting 
 commemoration of the country’s triumph against fascist 
 aggression during the Second World War (WWII).
The political analysts noted that Beijing suffered 
 immensely during the WWII by losing many citizens and 
 setting back the nation in terms of development, thus 
 deserves to celebrate its victory.
"The celebrations are marking the victory of human 
 determination over adversity.
"It is a demonstration that we can always overcome 
 and the world can look to China for appropriate 
 examples," said Levi Obonyo, a senior lecturer at 
 Daystar University and a communication consultant.
The event held on Thursday in Beijing was attended by 
 heads of state and foreign troops from 17 countries.
"It is noteworthy that it was China which engaged the 
 Japanese first.
The Victory Parade is a public projection of China’s 
 hard power capacity, in addition to its soft power 
 approach to global politics and Beijing’s ‘peaceful 
 rise’," said Peter Kagwanja, political scientist and CEO 
 of Africa Policy Institute.
Munene Macharia, an International Relations lecturer 
 at United States International University, said the 
 parade was a way for China to ascertain its interests 
 and give Chinese people a sense of direction.
"It promoted a sense of patriotism among the Chinese 
 people.
"It assured the Chinese people that they are safe and 
 they can defend themselves from external aggression," he 
 said.
Wachira Wang’ombe, Kenya’s former President Mwai 
 Kibaki’s political consultant, said the celebrations are 
 an important part not only of China but the world’s 
 history.
"The 70th anniversary of the triumph in WWII is a 
 great milestone that is worth being celebrated but more 
 importantly, it reminds people of what happened and that 
 war is expensive.
"|Most people in the world currently do not know much 
 about the WWII, thus they help to tell them the 
 history," he noted.
The analysts were unanimous that China played a great 
 role in ending the war that ran from 1939 to 1945.
"China refused to surrender and it was to her credit 
 that the Japanese were held out for long and eventually 
 the war became truly global.
"It is truly remarkable that China fought with such 
 limited equipment and still held the Japanese back," 
 said Obonyo.
The total victory and great triumph achieved by the 
 Chinese people after the World War II re-established 
 China as a major force in the world, observed Michael 
 Munyao, the chairman of China Africa Friendship 
 Association, Kenyan chapter.
In the spirit of the celebrations, Chinese President 
 Xi Jinping announced that the country will cut troops by 
 300,000.
The analysts noted that a lean military will be able 
 to promote China’s interests.
"By having a smaller force, China will be able to 
 better equip its troops with the most modern equipment," 
 said Mancharia.
"China will now use the money that was spent on 
 military on other issues like education and technology, 
 both in and out of the country.
"Africa is likely to be one of the biggest 
 beneficiaries to this spending as China spreads its 
 activities in the region," said Wang’ombe.
The cut in military personnel, according to Munyao, 
 exhibits Beijing’s efforts in modernizing its armed 
 forces.
"It is a way of promoting peace by telling the other 
 nations that look, we are not going to war again and 
 therefore we are toning down by reducing the number of 
 troops.
"China is set to pursue friendly relations with all 
 other Countries and uphold peace to mankind," he said.
China, as the analysts noted, can further play a big 
 role in promoting world peace by contributing troops for 
 UN peace keeping.
"China is not like the other big nations who like to 
 impose their will on smaller nations.
"China promotes world peace by ensuring all 
 engagements with other nations are based on win-win 
 partnership and mutual respect regardless of the size of 
 the country," said Mancharia.
Ambassador Ochieng Adala, the Deputy Director/ Acting 
 executive Director at Africa Peace Forum (APFO), a 
 conflict resolution think-tank, expects China to play a 
 bigger crucial role in UN peacekeeping operations, 
 particularly in Africa.
Kagwanja, however, noted that with the cut in troops, 
 China is pursuing a two-track strategy consisting of 
 peace and development.
"This new approach is a viable alternative to the old 
 hard power, West-centric world. Not surprisingly, this 
 soft power approach is greatly appealing to nations in 
 developing parts of the world such as Africa," Adala 
 told Xinhua.
"Facing the future, the peace-development nexus will 
 enable China to link development cooperation with its 
 growing contribution to global peace processes and UN 
 peacekeeping mission, especially in Africa," he added.
.
Nigerian analyst also impressed with China’s WWII 
 victory parade
by Olatunji Saliu ABUJA Nigeria (Xinhua) -- 
 China’s 
 victory parade commemorating the 70th anniversary of the 
 East Asian nation’s triumph against fascist aggression 
 during the Second World War (WWII) was evidently an 
 impressive display, an international affairs analyst in 
 Nigeria said Thursday.
"I think it demonstrates the new spirit of China: the 
 spirit of inclusion," Charles Onanaiju, an expert in 
 international relations, said in an interview with 
 Xinhua.
The event held on Thursday in Beijing was attended by 
 heads of state and foreign troops from 17 countries.
To all those who laid down their lives during the war 
 and other people who reckon with peace rather than 
 conflict across the globe, the parade was superlative in 
 nature and highly befitting enough to honor them, the 
 analyst declared.
"For most Nigerians, it was great too see China make 
 a very grand presentation at this occasion of the 70th 
 anniversary of the defeat of fascism and which is her 
 very first in commemorating this.
I can assure you that Nigeria shares a very good 
 sentiment about this development," he said.
He added: "The fact remains that what we saw today 
 (Thursday) in Tiananmen Square was a demonstration that 
 we can live together.
"And China is saying there will never be such moment 
 again: we have sufficient military strength to deter it 
 and we can also work very hard to bring an inclusive 
 world of shared prosperity.
"That is the message that was being sent out in 
 Tiananmen Square."
Going down memory lane, Onanaiju, also an author and 
 researcher of works in international relations, noted 
 China’s role in the second world war was not just a 
 major one, but a role pivotal in the defeat of fascism.
If Japan had managed to subjugate and overrun China, 
 the outcome of the war would have been different, he 
 opined, noting the latter, more than any other country 
 in the world, fought the longest war in the 
 anti-fascists struggle.
"The outcome of the second world war would have 
 meant, if China did not resist and Japan had freely 
 overrun and incorporated it to its own empire, it means 
 that African freedom would have been much-delayed longer 
 than it came," the analyst said.
According to him, the defeat of fascism and 
 resistance of the Chinese people had paved the way for 
 the completion of the anti-colonial struggle that 
 eventually brought liberation to most of Africa.
Chinese leader Xi Jinping announced, in the spirit of 
 the celebrations, that the country will cut troops by 
 300,000. Onanaiju said the announcement was a welcome 
 development as well as a laudable and reassuring 
 decision.
"With that statement, China is saying, look, warfare 
 has been redefined very clearly.
"Several years ago you need so much troops but now 
 peace must reign the world over," he said.
In deeds and words, the expert said, China has 
 demonstrated that it is committed to a peaceful rise, 
 perhaps the only time in history, without war, without 
 appropriating any other power, without looking for 
 someone to subjugate or dominate.
"In the direction it is going, it is very clear that 
 China would prefer a world of shared prosperity," he 
 said.
.
China’s military parade symbolic and strategic, say 
 Ghanaian experts
By Alex Osei-Boateng ACCRA Ghana (Xinhua) --
China’s 
 military parade held in Beijing on Thursday to mark the 
 70th anniversary of the end of World War II was both 
 symbolic and strategic, Ghanaian experts told Xinhua 
 here.
Dr Lloyd Adu Amoah, Assistant Professor at the Ashesi 
 University in Accra, said the military parade allowed 
 China to present itself as a military power that could 
 not be toyed with or looked down upon.
"China is indicating clearly to the world that it has 
 the capacity to defend itself: it has the necessary 
 hardware, it has the necessary number of infantry or 
 troops and it has the technological know-how.
"In many ways, for me, in reading the Chinese shows 
 that they want to display to the world their capacity as 
 a potent military force as the 21st century unfolds," he 
 told Xinhua in an interview.
China put on a massive military parade Thursday to 
 mark the 70th anniversary of the end of World War II and 
 the Chinese People’s War of Resistance against Japanese 
 aggression.
It was a picture-perfect parade to show the world how 
 far the country had come after a bitter victory seven 
 decades ago, and also how far it could go for its 
 hard-won peace and order.
President Xi Jinping announced in his speech that 
 China would cut the number of its troops by 300,000.
For Dr Amoah, Executive Director of Strategy3, a 
 public policy advocacy think tank based in Accra, the 
 troops downsizing should be seen in terms of China’s 
 increasing focus on technology.
He said China had been working hard on what he called 
 the 3G or 4G military organization, adding that there 
 was less focus on human bodies as it were and moved 
 focus on hi-tech command and control.
"China is saying that it is going more hi-tech when 
 it comes to its military philosophy and focus.
"And so, yes, it is definitely cutting the troop 
 numbers but that does not mean that it is not investing 
 in other key areas like investing in aircraft carriers 
 and state-of-the-art military planes," he said.
.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- 
 China put on a massive 
 military parade Thursday to mark the 70th anniversary of 
 the victory of Chinese People’s War of Resistance 
 against Japanese Aggression and the World Anti-Fascist 
 War.
The epic V-day parade has drawn rapid comments from 
 media worldwide.
Germany’s Der Spiegel magazine reported that Beijing 
 held the largest scale of military parade in the 
 nation’s history while the Chinese leader said in his 
 speech prior to the parade that the country will 
 substantially reduce the number of troops.
A BBC reporter analyzed President Xi Jinping’s 
 announcement of army reduction and said:
"It is also upgrading its naval and air forces ... so 
 does not need as many boots on the ground."
"Former UK Prime Minister Tony Blair is at the 
 parade," the Guardian noticed.
The Sydney Morning Herald published an article 
 titled "China’s military parade: who’s coming, who’s 
 not".
"One leader whose absence was never in doubt was 
 Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe," CNN said, 
 acknowledging China’s will to look into the future in 
 terms of Sino-Japanese relations.
Russia’s RIA Novosti gave attention to the weapons 
 exhibited during the parade: Chinese authorities intend 
 to demonstrate to the country’s residents and the 
 invited guests 500 pieces of 40 types of military 
 equipment.
JoongAng Ilbo of South Korea mentioned President 
 Park’s clothing:President Park attended China’s military 
 parade wearing a yellow jacket.
The Kyunghyang Shinmun of South Korea hailed China’s 
 parade: A parade that lasts for 70 minutes, a rise that 
 takes 70 years.
.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
With participation of 
 countries from Oriental, European and Pacific 
 battlefields during World War II (WWII), a military 
 parade in downtown Beijing on Thursday was a landmark 
 jubilee among the world’s Victory Day commemorations.
Unlike a few commemorations in Europe that mostly 
 involved countries on a specific warfare or battleground 
 such as the Normandy Invasion, China’s military parade 
 boasts much wider participation.
Twenty-three heads of state, including Russian 
 President Vladimir Putin, as well as a number of 
 government representatives and heads of international 
 organizations watched the parade that was joined by 
 nearly 1,000 foreign troops from 17 countries.
UN Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon said ahead of his 
 China trip that the international community recognizes 
 China’s contribution and sacrifice in WWII, and it is 
 very important now for the world to learn from the past 
 lessons and look forward in order to build a better 
 world.
A number of WWII allied countries, including the 
 United Kingdom, the United States and France, sent 
 former Secretary of State for Justice, ambassador to 
 China and Minister of Foreign Affairs as their 
 representatives to the event respectively.
Prior to the military parade, Chinese President Xi 
 Jinping met with the foreign guests.
Notably enough, former and incumbent leaders and 
 officials from Germany and Italy, the two major Axis 
 powers during WWII, were present in the events.
The presence of former German chancellor Gerhard 
 Schroeder, although in personal capacity, showed that he 
 faces up to history and has a vision for the future, 
 said Chen Mingming, a member of the Public Diplomacy 
 Advisory Panel under China’s Ministry of Foreign 
 Affairs.
In a written interview with Xinhua, Schroeder said 
 China made a very important contribution to the victory 
 in WWII, which was little known to Europeans.
Italy sent the incumbent Minister of Foreign Affairs 
 and International Cooperation Paolo Gentiloni to witness 
 the V-Day celebrations.
The broad participation of foreign countries in the 
 events shows their recognition of China’s crucial role 
 in WWII and their common aspiration for peace, Chen 
 said.
China was the first country in the world to fight 
 against Fascist forces when Japanese troops began 
 invasion of northeast China on September 18, 1931.
Japan began its full-scale aggression of China in 
 1937. By the end of WWII, more than 35 million Chinese 
 soldiers and civilians were killed or wounded.
A war memorial parade would be the best way to help 
 the world gain a better understanding of China’s 
 constructive role in WWII, said Chen.
.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- 
 Veterans who fought in 
 China’s war of resistance against Japanese aggression 
 took the lead in a massive military parade in 
 celebration of the 70th anniversary of the end of World 
 War II Thursday morning in downtown Beijing.
The veterans with an average age of 90, riding in 
 convertibles in formation, represented the 
 counter-aggression forces led by both the Communist 
 Party of China (CPC) and the Kuomintang (KMT).
The crowd applauded as vehicles carrying more than 
 100 war veterans, wearing uniforms decorated with 
 medals, passed through Tian’anmen Square.
It was the first time for the veterans to attend such 
 a grand military show and that could be the last they 
 witness. Many veterans expressed their pleasure at 
 having been invited to take part.
Fu Longqian, a 92-year-old former KMT soldier, was 
 among the veterans at the ceremony.
"The country didn’t forget us and it’s a very high 
 courteous reception," said the former artillerist who 
 braved the gunfire of significant battles, including the 
 Changsha Battle, the most time-consuming one between the 
 KMT army and Japanese invaders that had seen the 
 largest-scale troops from both sides.
"It’s the most memorable experience to fight against 
 Japanese aggressors in my life," he added.
Ninety-five-year-old Zhang Yuanhe, in grey military 
 uniform specially made for the parade, was gratified at 
 the invitation.
"It’s a great honor," said Zhang who joined the 
 CPC-led Red Army as early as the age of 15.
The KMT veteran representatives were selected from 
 those who had fought with Japanese troops in front-line 
 battlefields of Shanxi, Hunan, Yunnan, Guangxi and 
 Guizhou, while their CPC counterparts are veterans from 
 the Eighth Route Army, New Fourth Army, Northeast United 
 Resistance Army and South China Guerrillas.
The veterans all live on the Chinese mainland, 
 according to Qu Rui, deputy director of the Office of 
 the Parade Leading Team.
To ensure their good health, local civil affairs 
 departments had every veteran go through general 
 physical examination ahead of the celebration and 
 dispatched medical staff alongside.
"At such a grand event, we should not forget those 
 who fought for the nation and paved the way for the 
 peaceful days we enjoy today," said Peng Guangqian, 
 deputy secretary-general of the Council for National 
 Security Policy Studies.
"The invitation of veterans to such a military parade 
 is an opportunity to pay our tribute to them, and also 
 can inspire younger generations to forge ahead," Peng 
 said.
The decision to include KMT veterans in the 
 celebration was lauded by observers for the CPC’s 
 inclusive and open view of history.
The KMT fled to Taiwan in 1949 after losing a civil 
 war with the CPC.
"The parade sent a message that anyone who dedicated 
 their lives to the nation will be remembered, and those 
 who braved dangers to save the nation will be honored," 
 said Qiao Liang, a professor with the National Defense 
 University of the People’s Liberation Army.
Apart from war veterans, the two formations in 
 vehicles also include sons and daughters of fallen 
 soldiers from the CPC and KMT, and outstanding members 
 of forces that supported the front line.
Japan invaded northeast China in September 1931, 
 followed by a full-scale aggression that started on July 
 7, 1937 when the famous Lugou Bridge, or Marco Polo 
 Bridge, a crucial access point to Beijing, was attacked.
During Japan’s aggression, 35 million Chinese 
 soldiers and civilians were killed or wounded on the 
 eastern battlefield of the World Anti-Fascist War.
.
BEIJING (Xinhua) --
President Xi Jinping granted 
 medals to 30 Chinese and foreign veterans and civilians 
 who fought for China in World War II, ahead of the 
 country’s high-profile V-Day celebrations.
Xi, also chairman of the Central Military Commission, 
 said all national heroes, including those in World War 
 II, are the "backbone" of the Chinese nation and their 
 deeds and spirit are a great driving force for the 
 country.
"Any nation with hope cannot be without heroes and 
 any country with promising prospects cannot be without 
 pioneers," he said.
Xi said the purpose of the medal ceremony is to pay 
 tribute to the war heroes and show that the Chinese 
 people cherish peace and will remember history.
He attributed their heroic deeds to the "common will 
 of Chinese people" who united during hard times to fight 
 against Japanese aggression starting in 1931.
Xi described China’s victory as "a miracle in the war 
 history of mankind" as heroic Chinese people fought to 
 the very end in spite of brutal Japanese aggression.
The patriotic spirit that has taken shape through 
 China’s resistance against aggression is the driving 
 force for the country’s rejuvenation, he said.
Those who struggled for China’s national independence 
 and development are all national heroes, he said. 
 "Chinese people will never forget their enduring 
 accomplishments."
Xi also highly praised international anti-fascist 
 fighters from countries including the Soviet Union, the 
 United States, Britain, Korea, Canada and India who 
 fought side by side and forged a profound friendship 
 with Chinese people.
Among those honored with medals were Anna Chan 
 Chennault, wife of American pilot Claire Chennault, who 
 volunteered to fight against the Japanese air force 
 during the war; Joseph W. Stilwell, grandson of Joseph 
 Stilwell, commander of China, Burma, India Theater; and 
 M. W. Bethune, the grandson of Norman Bethune, a famous 
 Canadian army surgeon in China.
The front of the medal is embossed with WWII 
 soldiers, a pagoda from a revolutionary base in Yan’an, 
 the Yellow River, and an olive branch.
It symbolizes CPC’s decisive role during the war, 
 China’s drive for rejuvenation and its aspirations for 
 world peace.
The ceremony was held at the Great Hall of the People 
 in Beijing. Chinese leaders Li Keqiang, Zhang Dejiang, 
 Yu Zhengsheng, Liu Yunshan, Wang Qishan and Zhang Gaoli 
 were also present.
China’s central government granted the medals to 
 roughly 210,000 veterans and relatives.
Tian Shunxin, 95, from Pingshan town in north China’s 
 Hebei Province was honored with a medal in his hometown.
"I made a modest contribution during the war, but I’m 
 so happy that the country hasn’t forgotten me," said 
 Tian.
Tian joined the Eighth Route Army led by Communist 
 Party of China (CPC) in 1938. His head was wounded 
 during guerrilla warfare in June 1943.
Pang Jinyin from northwest China’s Shaanxi Province 
 was one year younger than Tian.
After he found he would be granted with a medal, he 
 shouted for a drink in order to celebrate.
"I survived to see China evolve into prosperity, so I 
 feel gratified.
"The blood shed by my peers is worth it," said Pang.
Pang was enrolled in the artillery of the 
 Kuomintang-led army in 1938.
He survived after a Japanese shell fell into his 
 trench but didn’t explode.
"They must not forget the history of the hard-won 
 war," said Pang.
Yang Sizi, 87, who will attend Thursday’s parade, 
 said:
"I feel sorry for my old comrades-in-arms who lost 
 their lives in their twenties or even younger.
"They are also a commemoration for those who 
 sacrificed their lives during the war," said Wang 
 Huizhen, daughter of 93-year-old veteran Wang Mocun.
She accompanied her father to receive the medal in 
 Beijing.
Huang Huanbi, wife of Israel Epstein, a Polish war 
 reporter in China, received the medal in Beijing.
"I am so moved to receive the medal for my late 
 husband. China still remembers us," she said.
Isabel Crook, 100, who studied rural China in the 
 1930s also received the medal.
Crook described it as a moment of truth in her life.
Hu Shaozhang, a 93-year-old veteran from southwest 
 China’s Sichuan Province, said "we refused to be 
 conquered in the past. We were bullied by others when we 
 were weak."
"Now our country has become strong, but we don’t want 
 to fight with others.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Veterans of the U.S. 
 "Flying Tigers" air squadron, which helped the Chinese 
 fight the Japanese during World War II, have backed 
 China’s V-Day parade as an opportunity to commemorate 
 the conflict and pay tribute to those killed.
International reaction to the parade has been mixed, 
 with some media questioning the political intentions 
 behind it.
"I do believe that a military parade or a military 
 demonstration following a conflict is necessary," said 
 Flying Tigers member Allen Larsen at a Wednesday press 
 conference ahead of the parade on Thursday.
"It is important to recognize those who participated 
 in the conflict, some of whom never came back," he said.
Catherine Stevens, widow of Ted Stevens, who served 
 in the squadron, said the parade would demonstrate 
 Chinese progress since wartime.
"I can understand why it is the way to celebrate, 
 since China had so little at the time of the war.
"I’m assuming it’s an opportunity for the Chinese 
 people to show how far they’ve come in 70 years as they 
 also remember the war," Stevens said.
Many foreign war heroes and their relatives will 
 attend the parade.
.
Foreign troops march in China parade to display 
 wartime unity against Fascism
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- As rifle-carrying foreign 
 troops clad in manifold uniforms goose-stepped with 
 crisp, tidy clip-clops and neatly choreographed 
 movements across the Tian’anmen Square, China’s V-Day 
 parade on Thursday gained its international gravity.
The display marked the country’s endeavor to revive 
 the forgotten memory that China and its global allies 
 joined hands to win a war against "the darkest forces 
 ever" in the history of mankind 70 years ago.
Nearly 1,000 high-spirited soldiers from 17 countries 
 marched in the wake of veterans and Chinese army 
 formations, marking the foreign troops’ premiere in a 
 Chinese military parade.
Among them were Belarus, Cuba, Egypt, Kazakhstan, 
 Kyrghyzstan, Mexico, Mongolia, Pakistan, Serbia, 
 Tajikistan and Russia.
Six others, including Afghanistan, Cambodia, Fiji, 
 Laos, Vanuatu and Venezuela, marched their delegations 
 for parade.
Most of those countries are sufferers of the World 
 War II and some of them gained national independence as 
 the post-war world order took shape.
They were observed by Chinese President Xi Jinping, 
 Russian President Vladimir Putin, and governmental 
 representatives including the U.S. Ambassador to China.
UN Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon, former British 
 Prime Minister Tony Blair and former Germany Chancellor 
 Gerhard Schroeder were on the rostrum.
"China’s contribution and sacrifice during the Second 
 World War is very much recognized, appreciated for all 
 such sufferings, and sympathized by the world people," 
 said Ban Ki-moon before the parade.
In Shanghai, Sara Imas, 65, was watching the 
 live-show of military parade.
She is a Jewish descendant born in the eastern 
 Chinese city.
They were among 30,000 refugees migrating from Europe 
 during the war.
"Chinese put themselves in our position and offered 
 help to us in the most difficult times," Imas told 
 Xinhua.
Chinese people’s empathy with Jewish refugees stemmed 
 mostly from their own pains inflicted by the Japanese 
 aggression.
China was the first country to face the onslaught of 
 the Axis Powers in 1937, two years before Britain and 
 France, and four years before the United States, Rana 
 Mitter wrote in his 2013 book "Forgotten Ally."
China’s anti-fascist war began even earlier actually. 
 On Sept. 18, 1931, Japanese army invaded northeastern 
 China, marking the starting point of the Chinese 
 people’s courageous fight against fascism.
American reporter Israel Epstein, writer of "The 
 People’s War," was initially skeptical of the 
 ill-equipped army of a country far from being 
 industrialized capable of making any effective 
 resistance against the Japanese aggression.
Epstein, a reporter on wartime China was surprised to 
 find how the communist-led guerrilla mobilized farmers 
 in occupied North China to make vast rural area a base 
 for tenacious, protracted war.
He described China as "an important ally of democracy 
 and frightening enemy of Fascist invaders," whose 
 struggle provided "meanings and hope" for people all 
 over the world.
China considered the march-past of foreign troops in 
 its V-Day parade a symbol of unity that China and allied 
 forces fought together to finally defeat the evil 
 forces.
Nell Calloway, granddaughter of Claire Lee Chennault, 
 hadn’t known her grandfather flew any airplanes until he 
 died.
"I don’t think I really appreciate his 
 accomplishments until I started reading all the books 
 about him."
Not a famous person in America though, Chennault is 
 an absolute super-hero in China.
Veterans of "Flying Tigers" led by Chennault were 
 invited to participate in the V-Day parade.
"Flying Tigers" is a nickname given to American 
 Volunteer Group, the air corps that fought alongside the 
 Chinese during war.
"What really impressed him is Chinese people’s 
 tenacity and willingness to do whatever it took," said 
 Calloway.
"They would rebuild the runways that the Japanese 
 bombed on overnight."
China paid "ghastly price," as Mitter put it, in its 
 own theater, more than a quarter of the WWII 
 battlefield.
China’s wartime casualties totaled more than 35 
 million, accounting for one-third of the world total.
American writer Wesley Marvin Bagby quoted Franklin 
 Roosevelt’s words in his book "The Eagle-Dragon 
 Alliance": "if China went under, ‘how many divisions of 
 Japanese troops do you think will be freed?’"
"The successful resistance put by the Chinese people 
 at great sacrifice was a very important contribution to 
 ending the Second World War," said Schroeder, who is 
 also the first German Chancellor being invited to the 
 D-Day celebration in France in 2004.
As China is growing into a global power, its V-Day 
 parade has caused criticisms that China is flexing its 
 military muscle, which may pose a threat to post-war 
 world order.
Zhang Ming, China’s vice minister of foreign affairs, 
 dismissed such concerns, describing the event as "a 
 demonstration of China’s aspiration for peace and its 
 firm will to defend it."
"It’s important to look to the past, what kinds of 
 lessons we have been learning, and how we can move ahead 
 to a brighter future," Inn Buruma, wrote in his 
 bestseller "Year Zero: 1945."
In Buruma’s view, the post-war world order was 
 anything but once-for-all happy ending.
The Cold War was quick to distort the world order for 
 lasting peace written in the 1945 Charter of the United 
 Nations.
Its latest evidence went to Shinzo Abe’s endeavor to 
 alter Japan’s peaceful constitution by calling it 
 "anachronistic."
Some 120,000 people rallied in Japan’s parliament 
 building on Sunday to oppose the amendment bill.
Nobusuke Kishi, Abe’s grandfather who played a major 
 role in the invasion of the Northeast China and ran his 
 country’s war economy was never put on trial like other 
 war criminals.
In 1957, he even became the prime minister of Japan.
Now Abe vowed to bring down Nobusuke’s "political 
 legacy," putting the East Asia and the world under what 
 Buruma called the "long dark shadow of the history."
Zhang denied the parade targeting at the Japanese 
 people in general, describing it as a necessity to 
 reaffirm the determination to work for world peace and 
 prosperity.
"Though reflecting upon and drawing lessons from the 
 Second World War, we will join hand to usher in a better 
 future for the mankind."
Dmitry Bobrov, commander of Russian troops in 
 Thursday’s parade, said, "Our elder generations once 
 fought the common enemy, now we march at a synchronized 
 pace. It has symbolic meanings."
"We fought together like brothers and we were able to 
 change our history. Now we need to come together in 
 peace and change our future," Calloway said.
.
China displays armament based on actual combat roles 
 in V-Day parade
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- Tanks and missile launchers 
 rumbled past the Tian’anmen Square on Thursday as China 
 marked its victory in World War II with a military 
 parade underlining the "actual combat" capability of its 
 weapon systems.
Armament formations were arranged for the first time 
 based on their actual combat roles.
The ground formations included modules for ground 
 combat, air defense and missile defense, maritime 
 attacks, strategic strikes, communication support, and 
 logistics and armament support.
The strategic strikes part, for example, has 
 displayed the top-class missiles of the Second Artillery 
 Force, China’s strategic missile force, including 
 long-range, medium-range and short-range missiles as 
 well as conventional and nuclear missiles.
In previous parades, the armament formations were 
 only distinguished as ground armament formations and air 
 echelons.
Analysts said it is in line with the "combat ready" 
 principle, required of the People’s Liberation Army (PLA) 
 by President Xi Jinping, also chairman of the Central 
 Military Commission.
"This indicates a change of the PLA training 
 strategy; with more focus on actual combat," said Peng 
 Guangqian, deputy secretary-general of the Council for 
 National Security Policy Studies.
In September last year at a meeting with PLA chiefs 
 of staff, Xi said headquarters of all PLA forces should 
 improve their combat readiness and sharpen their ability 
 to win a regional war in the age of information 
 technology.
The ten air echelons were formed into airborne early 
 warning and control aircraft, bombers, fighters, 
 carrier-based aircraft, maritime patrol aircraft and 
 others.
BEIJING, Sept. 3 (Xinhua) -- 
 Following are highlights of the events on Thursday to 
 commemorate the 70th anniversary of the victory of the 
 Chinese People’s War of Resistance Against Japanese 
 Aggression and the World Anti-Fascist War.
• It was the first Chinese military parade marking 
 any anniversary of the war and the first with foreign 
 military participation.
• It was the first time that Xi Jinping had reviewed 
 troops as the country’s top leader and delivered a 
 speech atop the Tian’anmen Rostrum.
• Twenty-three heads of state and government leaders, 
 including Russian President Vladimir Putin and Republic 
 of Korea President Park Geun-hye, watched the military 
 parade.
• Former British prime minister Tony Blair and former 
 German chancellor Gerhard Schroeder were present.
• Attendees also included government representatives 
 and heads of international organizations, including 
 United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon.
• More than 100 foreign VIPs or relatives of wartime 
 heroes attended the event, including relatives of 
 Canadian doctor Norman Bethune, Japanese veterans who 
 served in the Eighth Route Army and veterans of the 
 "Flying Tigers" of the United States.
• A total of 12,000 troops, 500 pieces of equipment, 
 and nearly 200 aircraft were shown.
• Nearly 1,000 foreign troops from 17 countries also 
 participated, including a 75-member formation dispatched 
 by Russia.
• Ten foot formations of the People’s Liberation Army 
 (PLA) were named after the most famous anti-Japanese 
 army units. This was the first time that the PLA had 
 organized a parade in such a way.
• Veterans of both the Communist Party of China (CPC) 
 and the Kuomintang (KMT) who fought the Japanese 
 participated, the first time that veterans had joined a 
 parade.
• It was also the first time that female guards of 
 honor of the three services of the PLA had taken part in 
 a military parade.
• More than 50 generals led foot formations and 
 armament formations, or flew the leader aircraft in the 
 air echelons.
• The PLA arranged its armament in formations based 
 on their actual combat roles for the first time.
• About 84 percent of armaments displayed in the 
 parade had never been viewed by the public previously.
• The Army, Navy, Air Force, Second Artillery Force 
 and Armed Police all debuted their new armament, which 
 range from intercontinental ballistic missiles to 
 medium-long range bombers. All of the main-battle 
 armament are made in China.
Some 40,000 people were present in Tian’anmen 
 Square, which could be the largest live audience to 
 watch any parade in China.
.
Thousands of Chinese troops participate in epic V-Day 
 parade
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Thousands of Chinese 
 troops, along with their counterparts from 17 countries, 
 marched past Tian’anmen Square; tanks and armor vehicles 
 mounted with drones and missiles rumbled by.
China put on a massive military parade Thursday to 
 mark the 70th anniversary of the end of World War II and 
 what it calls the Chinese People’s War of Resistance 
 against Japanese Aggression.
It was a picture-perfect parade to show the world how 
 far the country has come after a bitter victory seven 
 decades ago, and also how far it could go for its 
 hard-won peace and order.
In many ways, Thursday’s parade - the 15th since 1949 
 and a part of China’s larger WWII commemorations that 
 have been in the run for months - was a first in the 
 country.
It was the first non-National day parade held by New 
 China at the heart of Beijing, and the first to have 
 invited foreign troops to march in it.
It was also China’s first military parade observed by 
 President Xi Jinping as the country’s top leader.
On the Tian’anmen Rostrum where late Chinese leader 
 Mao Zedong pronounced the birth of New China 66 years 
 ago, Xi, dressed in a sharply cut, high-collared Mao 
 suit, highlighted China’s aspiration of peace.
"No matter how much stronger it may become, China 
 will never seek hegemony or expansion.
"It will never inflict its past suffering on any 
 other nation," said Xi.
Xi also announced in his speech that China will cut 
 the number of its troops by 300,000.
The Chinese president was joined by dozens of heads 
 of state and government as well as international 
 organizations including UN Secretary-General Ban 
 Ki-moon, Russian President Vladimir Putin, and Republic 
 of Korea President Park Geun-hye.
The United States, Britain and France sent government 
 representatives to attend the parade.
Former German chancellor Gerhard Schroeder and former 
 British prime minister Tony Blair were also present.
Their coming made the landmark event one with the 
 widest foreign presence in the world among a series of 
 V-Day commemorations.
The celebrations were set in motion by 70-gun salutes 
 after Premier Li Keqiang announced its official opening.
The sun shone in a stunning blue sky, dispelling the 
 last bits of the morning chill as well as the fatigue 
 from more than 40,000 audiences who waited hours on 
 roofless benches alongside the Chang’an Avenue.
Guards of honor marched on a red carpet that 
 stretched between two Great Wall-shaped parterres in the 
 Tian’anmen Square with huge signs that read 1945 and 
 2015, to raise the national flag to the March of the 
 Volunteers - a popular wartime tune-turned national 
 anthem - played by a 1,000-member military band.
"The victory of the Chinese People’s War of 
 Resistance Against Japanese Aggression is the first 
 complete victory won by China in its resistance against 
 foreign aggression in modern times," said Xi in his 
 speech prior to the parade.
"This great triumph opened up bright prospects for 
 the great renewal of the Chinese nation and set our 
 ancient country on a new journey after gaining rebirth," 
 Xi said in his about 10-minute address.
It’s been 84 years since China was dragged into war 
 following Japan’s invasion of northeast China in 1931. 
 In the fourteen years that followed, over 35 million 
 soldiers and civilians were killed and injured in China, 
 the main oriental theatre of WWII.
But the loss was not for nothing. Chinese archives 
 revealed that over two thirds of Japan’s ground forces 
 were fought against in China during WWII.
Japan signed its formal WWII surrender on Sept. 2, 
 1945, and China celebrated its victory the following 
 day.
"China’s contribution and sacrifice during the Second 
 World War is very much recognized, (China is) 
 appreciated for all such sufferings, and sympathized by 
 the world’s people," UN Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon 
 said last week in New York before traveling to China.
"It’s important to look to the past, what kinds of 
 lessons we have been learning, and how we can move ahead 
 to a brighter future based on the lessons learned," he 
 said.
As he reviewed the troops in a black open-top Red 
 Flag limousine, Xi Jinping greeted his "comrades" from 
 the People’s Liberation Army (PLA) and the People’s 
 Armed Police who stood to attention down the length of 
 Beijing’s magnificent Chang’an Avenue.
"Follow the Party! Fight to win! Forge exemplary 
 conduct!" over 10,000 servicemen and women saluted Xi 
 and exclaimed.
At the height of the celebrations, helicopters 
 carrying China’s national flag and the PLA flag drew the 
 curtains for the much-anticipated military parade.
Another 20 choppers flew in a formation that spelt 
 "70" in the air, followed by seven training aircraft 
 trailing colored smoke.
On the ground, WWII veterans, chest bristling with 
 medals, rode in convertibles amidst tides of applause.
From afar, the saluting veterans looked straightfaced 
 but spirited.
Only the occasional shake of hands, magnified on the 
 big screens that stood on the two sides of Tian’anmen 
 Square, betrayed their inner thrill.
Xi and all the other audience stood up as they passed 
 by.
For many of the country’s remaining WWII veterans, 
 this anniversary could be the last they saw.
Ninety-five-year-old Zhang Yuanhe, in grey military 
 uniform specially made for the parade, was gratified at 
 the invitation to take part in the parade.
"It’s a great honor," said Zhang who joined the 
 Communist Party of China (CPC)-led Red Army at the age 
 of 15.
More notably, veterans from counter-Japanese 
 aggression forces led by CPC during WWII were joined in 
 a Chinese military parade for the first time by their 
 counterparts from the Kuomintang (KMT) forces who fought 
 the same enemies 70 years ago.
Many of the KMT-led forces fled to Taiwan in 1949 
 after losing a civil war with the CPC. Confrontation 
 between the mainland and the island in the following 
 decades made it impossible for the two sides to 
 acknowledge each other’s contribution to the war.
The situation has begun to change in recent years 
 with the improvement of relations across the Taiwan 
 Strait.
Fu Longqian, 92, was among the KMT veterans invited 
 to Thursday’s celebrations.
"The country didn’t forget us and it’s a very high 
 courteous reception," said the former artillerist who 
 braved the gunfire of significant battles, including the 
 Changsha Battle, the most time-consuming one between the 
 KMT army and Japanese invaders that saw the 
 largest-scale troops from both sides.
"It’s the most memorable experience to fight against 
 Japanese aggression in my life," he added.
Excitement and thrill filled Tian’anmen Square as the 
 PLA guards of honor and 10 foot formations - each named 
 after a morale-boosting battle fought by Communist-led 
 troops or Chinese war heroes and model combatants - 
 marched by in impeccable synchrony and coordination.
Soldiers, drilled to perfection for months, barely 
 blinked as they goosestepped past the Tian’anmen Rostrum 
 in 128 carefully measured paces, each precisely 75 cm.
But the highlight for many of the 40,000 audience 
 present and hundreds of millions more who watched the 
 parade on television or via Internet was the first-ever 
 participation of foreign troops in a Chinese military 
 parade in Beijing.
Nearly 1,000 foreign troops from 17 countries marched 
 at the heels of their PLA counterparts, drawing cheers 
 and applause.
It was the first time that foreign troops had been 
 invited to a Chinese military parade at the Tian’anmen 
 Square.
Sara Imas in Shanghai was watching the live-show of 
 military parade.
"They were among 30,000 refugees who migrated from 
 Europe during the war.
"Chinese put themselves in our position and offered 
 help to us in the most difficult times," Imas told 
 Xinhua.
Chinese people’s empathy with Jewish refugees stemmed 
 mostly from their own pains inflicted by the Japanese 
 aggression.
China was the first country to face the onslaught of 
 the Axis Powers in 1937, two years before Britain and 
 France, and four years before the United States, Rana 
 Mitter wrote in her 2013 book "Forgotten Ally."
On Sept. 18, 1931, Japanese army invaded northeastern 
 China, marking the starting point of the Chinese 
 people’s courageous fight against fascism.
In the 14 years that followed, countries including 
 the former Soviet Union and the United States among 
 others, all came to China’s aid in its struggle for 
 national freedom.
A female medical soldiers’ formation was named after 
 Canadian surgeon Norman Bethune to honor his 
 contribution to Chinese people’s fight against Japanese 
 aggressors.
Jay Vinyard, an allied pilot who flew supplies to 
 Chinese forces over the Hump Route during WWII, said 
 China’s war commemorations were a rare chance for 
 wartime pilots to meet again.
China and the United States should join hands to 
 achieve peace and stability in the world, he said.
"All eyes are on the parade in Beijing," 22-year-old 
 four-time Red Square parader Anton Mikhailov told Xinhua 
 prior to the parade.
"Our parade on Red Square in Moscow and this parade 
 in Beijing are both for the same things: to show that we 
 remember our losses and our victory; to demonstrate our 
 nations’ strength; and to tell the world that the two 
 allies that had fought shoulder to shoulder will join 
 hands for a better future," he said.
The ground armament formations of the 70-minute 
 parade include modules for ground combat, air defense 
 and missile defense, maritime attacks, strategic 
 strikes, communication support, and logistics and 
 armament support.
This was the first time that the PLA arranged its 
 armament based on their actual combat roles in a parade, 
 said Peng Guangqian, deputy secretary-general of the 
 Council for National Security Policy Studies.
"This indicates a change of the PLA training 
 strategy, with more focus on actual combat," Peng said.
The parade included a host of China’s home-made 
 conventional and nuclear weaponry, which bespoke the 
 PLA’s long march from an army mainly composed of 
 infantry to informationized military.
Eighty-four per cent of the 500 pieces of armament 
 rolled out on Thursday had never been shown to the 
 public before.
On display were China’s Dongfeng-5B intercontinental 
 strategic missiles designed to carry nuclear warheads, 
 and the Dongfeng-21D anti-ship ballistic missiles 
 described by some media as the "carrier killer."
Other cutting edge weaponry included the PLA’s 
 state-of-the-art tanks, unmanned aerial vehicles, and 
 its new generation of airborne early warning and control 
 aircraft, carrier-based fighters and attack helicopters 
 which streaked low across the skies.
Among the armaments that were paraded in public for 
 the first time were China’s HJ-10 anti-tank missiles, 
 HQ-12 anti-aircraft missiles and the third-generation 
 carrier-based medium-long range air defense missiles.
Also in spotlight are China’s shore-based anti-ship 
 missiles which are capable of destroying large targets.
Experts believe that the high-profile weaponry 
 display reflects the latest modernization of the Chinese 
 armed forces, which was a result of the country’s 
 economic and technological progress.
The gleaming hardware rolling through posed a sharp 
 contrast to China’s poor weaponry in the wartime seven 
 decades ago.
"In the fierce battle, the Japanese had rifles, tanks 
 and fighter planes," veteran Hu Lidong said. "Our men 
 were mowed down."
The parade was also inherently in line with the 
 defensive strategy of the world’s second largest 
 economy.
A signatory of the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of 
 Nuclear Weapons, China has repeatedly vowed to adhere to 
 the policy of no-first-use of nuclear weapons and the 
 policy that it will, unconditionally, not use or 
 threaten to use nuclear weapons against 
 non-nuclear-weapon states and nuclear-weapon-free zones.
China is the only nuclear-weapon country that has 
 publicly made the pledge.
"It’s just like when you have a knife, you can use it 
 either for offense or defense," said Chen Zhou, director 
 of the National Defense Policy Research Center of the 
 Academy of Military Sciences of China’s People’s 
 Liberation Army. "It is your strategy behind that really 
 matters."
China’s latest white paper on military strategy 
 issued this year underscored its principles of "defense, 
 self-defense and post-emptive strikes."
The high-profile V-Day parade concluded at about 
 11:40 a.m., with some 70,000 white doves and 70,000 
 balloons released into the sky over Tian’anmen Square to 
 make a symbol of peace.
Seventy years after the victory of the war, there are 
 still few people ignoring historical facts, denying and 
 even beautifying the invading history, which is sheer 
 contempt of history, damage to international order and 
 provocation to peace, an editorial published on 
 Thursday’s People’s Daily said.
The parade will send a signal to the world to 
 remember history and cherish peace, it stressed.
"I was not aware of how technologically advanced the 
 Chinese army is (before I came here)," said Serbian 
 formation leader Marko Marjanovic, adding that parades 
 are a perfect way to commemorate countries’ warring 
 past.
"Serbian people cherish the tradition of 
 (commemorating the end of) WWII. Our country, which was 
 Yugoslavia at the time, was conquered by foreign 
 occupying force and we also fought for freedom in the 
 same way (as the Chinese)," Marjanovic said.
"We see that our 
 and the Chinese contribution was positive in WWII, and 
 we want to maintain that tradition further on," he said.
.
Nepalese officials praise China’s heroism in WWII, 
 role in world peace
KATHMANDU Nepal (Xinhua) --
Nepalese officials and 
 experts have highly praised China’s role in world peace 
 amid the celebration of the 70th anniversary of the 
 Chinese People’s War of Resistance against Japanese 
 Aggression and the World Anti-Fascist War.
Terming the celebration as a glorious moment to 
 commemorate China’s contribution in defeating the 
 invaders in World War II, the officials of neighboring 
 Nepal have congratulated Chinese government and people 
 for the landmark victory.
"This V-day recalls the liberation of Chinese people 
 from aggression, cruelty and inhuman behavior. It refers 
 to a pride history and provides a message of peace," 
 former chief secretary of Nepal government Leela Mani 
 Paudel told Xinhua.
Nepalese officials appreciated that China has always 
 respected the national independence of neighboring 
 countries including Nepal.
Paudel said, "China has been encouraging developing 
 and under- developed countries to move ahead in the path 
 of development and prosperity, which is totally 
 praise-worthy."
This year marks the 60th anniversary of the 
 establishment of China-Nepal diplomatic ties.
As the nearest neighbor, China has been assisting 
 Nepal in its every development endeavors since very 
 beginning.
"V-day commemoration is a very special occasion to 
 show the achievement of China, after being freed from 
 colonial legacy and reaching a significant economic 
 height.
"They have every reason to be proud after achieving 
 the miraculous development," Rajeshwar Acharya, Former 
 Ambassador of Nepal to China said.
Nepalese media have also commended the celebration 
 marking the 70th anniversary of the end of World War II
A senior Nepalese journalist Prem Kumari Pant told 
 Xinhua"
"The day is a landmark in China’s history. It gives a 
 message that peaceful development is possible ending 
 conflict in the world."
The photos of the military parade were also highly 
 shared and talked about by Nepalese people in social 
 media.
.
by Naim-Ul-Karim DHAKA Bangladesh (Xinhua) --
Bangladesh’s political leaders on Thursday lauded 
 China’s V-Day parade as showing Beijing’s commitment to 
 upholding world peace and promoting common development 
 and prosperity for all countries.
They said the parade, which was held earlier in the 
 day, is virtually to tell the world clearly that China 
 cherishes peace and its military power serves as an 
 effective guarantee of it.
Bangladeshi leaders appreciate the Chinese people, 
 the government and the Communist Party of China for 
 holding such a grand commemoration which not merely 
 honors all those who sacrificed their lives but also 
 bears history in mind for a better future of the world.
Bangladeshi Information Minister Hasanul Huq Inu, 
 among other officials, said China has not only defeated 
 the Japanese invaders but also immensely contributed to 
 the fight against fascist forces in World War Two.
"Supreme sacrifices of the Chinese people contributed 
 immensely to restore peace not merely in China but 
 across the world," said the minister.
He wished the Chinese government and people for 
 success in their struggle to build a powerful, 
 modernized and prosperous nation and hope that Beijing 
 would contribute more to world peace, development and 
 stability.
National Standing Committee Member of the BNP, Lt. 
 Gen. Mahbubur Rahman (retired), also the former Chief of 
 Army Staff of Bangladesh Army, told Xinhua that Japan’s 
 defeat is a prelude to the end of World War II.
"It is a victory of people of China," said Rahman.
"China’s military demonstration shows its commitment 
 to the world peace," he said, adding, "China upholds 
 world peace and plays an important role in establishing 
 world peace."
"China believes in world solidarity, world unity and 
 world justice."
Communist Party of Bangladesh (ML) Secretary General 
 Dilip Barua said the commemoration of the 70th 
 anniversary of the victory of the Chinese People’s War 
 of Resistance against Japanese Aggression bears 
 historical significance and long future impact.
"The commemoration ceremonies will surely contribute 
 to global peace and stability in the days ahead," said 
 Barua, who is also a former Bangladeshi industries 
 minister.
"Today’s military parade is also a kind protest 
 against the fascists who try to create instability in 
 the world."
.
SUVA Fiji (Xinhua) --
A Fijian cabinet minister on 
 Thursday lauded China’s V-Day parade held earlier in the 
 day, recognizing China as a peace-loving country whose defense strategy meets its obligations as a permanent 
 member of the United Nations Security Council in 
 maintaining and preserving world peace.
Jioji Konrote, Fiji’s minister for employment, 
 productivity and industrial relations made these 
 comments at a reception hosted by the Chinese embassy in 
 Fiji, where over 300 people, including Fijian Prime 
 Minister Voreqe Bainimarama and wife Maria, government 
 officials, members of parliament, members of the 
 diplomatic corps and representatives from the local 
 Chinese community gathered to watch rebroadcasting of 
 the live coverage of the military parade to commemorate 
 the 70th anniversary of the end of World War II and the 
 victory of the Chinese People’s War of Resistance 
 against Japanese Aggression.
"On the occasion of the 70th anniversary of the 
 victory, we commemorate today the heroic and indomitable 
 Chinese people, fighting bloody battles and making 
 tremendous sacrifices, defeating invaders and 
 safeguarding China’s independence and national pride.
"As we commemorate the victory of this conflict, let 
 us remember history and learn from the mistakes of our 
 past," Konrote said as he delivered his speech on behalf 
 of the Fijian government.
"Today, as a peace-loving country, the People’s 
 Republic of China has placed national security firmly in 
 the hands of its own citizens, and has adopted a 
 realistic and pragmatic defense strategy to protect its 
 national integrity and security and at the same time 
 meet its obligations as a permanent member of the United 
 Nations Security Council in maintaining and preserving 
 world peace, " the Fijian cabinet minister said.
The Pacific island country sent a team to participate 
 in the historic parade.
"The Fijian government is represented in this year’s 
 commemoration victory parade in Beijing by a small 
 contingent of the Republic of Fiji Military Forces led 
 by Land Force Commander Col. Sitiveni Qiliho.
"In fact, we are honored and proud to be part of this 
 celebration," Konrote said, adding that the occasion " 
 reminds us of our past, but more importantly 
 demonstrates our collective aspiration as a global 
 community to preserve and maintain world peace."
Zhang Ping, Chinese ambassador to Fiji commended the 
 supportive move made by Fiji.
"The Fijian soldiers marched through Tian’anmen 
 Square in high morale, presenting the good image of the 
 Fijian military forces as well as the country.
"They have left a deep impression on the Chinese 
 people," said Zhang.
.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- Under a sunny blue sky, 
 Beijing on Thursday morning witnessed a grand military 
 parade commemorating the 70th anniversary of the end of 
 World War II, and the rest of the country was also 
 immersed in joy, with bitter memory of the hard-won 
 victory against Japanese aggression.
Chinese people enjoyed the parade in different ways. 
 At 6 a.m., many people swarmed to areas behind road 
 blocks near the parade venue to squeeze for a good view.
Others watched live broadcast while joining in an 
 online rally of forwarding pictures of the parade via 
 social media.
Elnur, an English teacher of Uygur ethnic group in 
 Urumqi, capital of northwest China’s Xinjiang, said she 
 was deeply impressed by veterans waving hands with tears 
 in their eyes.
"They must be very proud of what they contributed to 
 our country seven decades ago," she said.
Elnur watched TV while chatting via WeChat, a social 
 media software on her cell phone, where she shared 
 comments and pictures of the parade with her friends.
In Peking University in Beijing, although the new 
 semester has not yet commenced, hundreds of students and 
 teachers gathered in the canteen to watch live TV 
 broadcast of the parade.
Lin Nan, a post-graduate student, said the parade 
 gave Chinese people a sense of pride and security that 
 the army has the prowess for safeguarding the country’s 
 interests.
However, she was more deeply impressed by President 
 Xi Jinping’s speech at the ceremony that no matter how 
 much stronger it may become, China will never seek 
 hegemony or expansion.
It will never inflict its past suffering on any other 
 nation.
The 11th Panchen Lama Bainqen Erdini Qoigyijabu said 
 after watching the parade at Tian’anmen Square, that he 
 feels proud of the country and calls for people to 
 cherish the hard-won victory.
In central China’ Hubei Province, a senior man asked 
 his family to push his wheelchair to the front of the TV 
 screen to allow his defected sight to watch the live TV 
 broadcast.
The man Zhou Xiong, aged 106, is a well-known 
 sharpshooter during China’s war of resistance against 
 Japanese aggression.
While watching TV, the veteran became emotional 
 missing his fellow brothers who did not survive to see 
 China’s victory.
"I want to write a letter to express the gratitude of 
 a veteran to hail for the country’s military building.
"I am fortunate to see the country’s prosperity and 
 the troops becoming strong," he said.
Zhou, skilled with his right-hand shooting, had his 
 right arms shot broken in war.
After he rehabilitated, he practiced hard with his 
 left hand for shooting, and soon became skillful again.
Over 100 representatives of veterans who fought 
 against Japanese aggression army during the war joined 
 the parade troops on Thursday.
More than 35 million Chinese people, both military 
 and civilians, were killed or injured in the war, 
 accounting for a third of the total casualties of all 
 the countries involved in WWII.
President Xi said on Thursday the Chinese People’s 
 War of Resistance Against Japanese Aggression, as part 
 of the World Anti-Fascist War, "started the earliest and 
 lasted the longest."
Watching arrays of China’s home-made conventional and 
 nuclear weaponry, over 2,000 overseas Chinese invited to 
 the parade were filled with excitement and thrill. Many 
 of them were relatives and offsprings of late Chinese 
 generals.
Li Cuiying, widow of late Chinese general Zhan 
 Daoliang, recently had a leg surgery.
"I know my husband would have overcome any 
 difficulties to attend the ceremony, if he could live to 
 this day," she said.
Graduated from China’s famous Whampoa Military 
 Academy, general Zhan had fought in both air force and 
 artillery troops.
The war left 11 bullet wounds on his body, and one of 
 his feet was injured. He died of illness in the U.S. 
 last year.
Li said China’s parade is making a strong statement 
 that it is self-reliant and it has an independent 
 military capability to develop on its own.
"China was invaded by foreign powers because it was 
 weak and poor. Only a strong country can protect its own 
 people," she said.

‘YES, 
 WE COMMITTED ATROCITIES AND CRUEL THINGS DURING OUR 
 INVASION IN CHINA, AND WE ARE SORRY’
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Cho Sung-hye got up at 4:10 
 am on Thursday, excited about her attendance at 
 Beijing’s World War II commemoration parade as an 
 honored guest.
The 57-year-old professor from the Republic of Korea 
 (ROK) traveled to Beijing from Hefei in east China, 
 where she works at Hefei University.
Cho has taught in Hefei since 1996 and became the 
 first ROK citizen to get a permanent residence permit in 
 China in 2006.
"China is a country that respects history and the 
 virtue of gratitude.
"I think the reason China attaches such an importance 
 to the WWII victory anniversary is that it seeks to join 
 hands with all peace-loving people in the world to face 
 up to history and safeguard future security," said Cho.
Upon arriving in Beijing, she found the whole city 
 immersed in a festive air.
China and ROK both suffered from Japanese aggression 
 during the war.
Tens of millions of people from both countries were 
 tortured, raped and killed by Japanese invaders.
The two worked in unity and helped one another 
 achieve victory.
"Through the parade, China demonstrated its ability 
 in safeguarding its economic and social development and 
 that it keeps in mind that we owe the peace and 
 happiness that we have today to our forebears who 
 sacrificed their lives fighting against foreign 
 aggression," she said.
Jay Vinyard, an American pilot who flew supplies to 
 Chinese forces over the Hump during World War II, was 
 among more than 100 foreign WWII veterans, anti-fascist 
 fighters and their relatives invited to the military 
 parade.
Vinyard, 92, maintains a sharp mind and memories of 
 the war. China’s WWII commemorations were a rare chance 
 for wartime pilots to meet again in Beijing. China and 
 the United States should join hands to achieve peace and 
 stability in the world, he said.
He said he was 21 when joined the China-American 
 joint service on the Hump Operation, dubbed the "death 
 route" over the Himalayan mountains, which was a major 
 route for bringing supplies from India to southwest 
 China from 1942 to 1945.
"At the age of 92, I am still looking forward to 
 living longer.
"I hope everyone enjoys life and says no to warfare," 
 he said.
While addressing parade attendees, President Xi 
 Jinping said that the victory of the Chinese People’s 
 War of Resistance against Japanese Aggression 
 re-established China as a major country in the world and 
 won the Chinese people respect of all peace-loving 
 people around the world.
It was the first time foreign troops were invited to 
 a Chinese military parade. Nearly 1,000 troops from 17 
 countries, grouped alphabetically according to their 
 country names, marched at the heels of their PLA 
 counterparts, drawing cheers and applause.
Anastasia Poshinova, from Russia, a postgraduate 
 student from Tsinghua University in Beijing, said she 
 was excited to see Russian President Vladimir Putin 
 attend the parade and Russian troops march past 
 Tian’anmen Square as she watched the parade live on TV.
"I felt so excited! I like the fact that the Russian 
 army went together with other post-soviet countries’ 
 armies during the parade," she said.
Shedfar Likoev, from Tajikistan, a postgraduate 
 majored in international relations in Peking University, 
 said he is proud that his country took part in such a 
 great event in China.
"Tajikistan is one of the smallest and poorest 
 countries in the world, but we still get the opportunity 
 to show the best part of us with China.
"I see this as a great achievement for Tajikistan," 
 he said.
Kobayashi Kancho was among 30 Chinese and foreign 
 veterans and civilians who fought for China in World War 
 II that were granted medals by President Xi Jinping on 
 Wednesday.
At 95, the Japanese native finds it difficult to 
 walk, but still managed to attend the ceremony.
In 1940, Kobayashi landed in east China’s Qingdao as 
 a soldier with the Japanese army.
He was captured by China’s Eighth Route Army in 1941.
However, the muzzle of his machine gun shifted after 
 he pulled the trigger and he survived.
Following his capture, he witnessed Chinese villages 
 burnt by the Imperial Japanese Army and innocent people 
 killed by the Japanese soldiers.
He gradually realized the war initiated by Japan 
 against China was a war of aggression and brought 
 tremendous pain and suffering to the Chinese people.
He then decided to join the Eighth Route Army, and 
 helped distribute anti-war leaflets, write slogans and 
 make telephone calls, trying to persuade the Japanese 
 army to surrender.
Kobayashi said he felt regret that right-wing 
 Japanese politicians today still bear "outdated and 
 dangerous" ideologies.
"I will continue to do my best in promoting 
 China-Japan friendship ties.
"I wish so much to go back to see the places where I 
 fought with Chinese people to put an end to the Japanese 
 aggression war in China," he said.
Mourad Alami, a German professor teaching at Hefei 
 University, said he can’t agree more with President Xi’s 
 speech at the parade, that without justice, peace can 
 not be permanently installed.
"I am sure that the Chinese will forgive Japan if it 
 has the courage like Germany to say ‘Yes, we committed 
 atrocities and cruel things during our invasion in 
 China, and we are sorry,’" said Alami.
He said Germany is now convinced of pacifism and does 
 not want any kind of war.
.
Serbia, China both make great sacrifices 
 in World Anti-Fascist War: president
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Serbian President Tomislav 
 Nikolic said Tuesday that both China and Serbia were 
 both victims of the World War II (WWII) and made 
 tremendous sacrifices in the fight against fascism.
The Serbian leader came to China for the 
 commemorative activities and military parade to mark the 
 70th anniversary of the victory of the Chinese People’s 
 War of Resistance against Japanese Aggression and the 
 World Anti-Fascist War, and said he is confident that 
 China’s V-Day parade will be a success.
"I could see on TV how China prepares for the 
 commemoration ... I’m also very pleased that one unit of 
 the Serbian guard will also participate in the parade," 
 he said ahead of the Sept. 3 parade.
The president said he was very happy to be with the 
 Chinese to mark the events and the very part that he 
 wants to see in Thursday’s parade is the Chinese 
 soldiers.
He said that he would like to see "how well-trained 
 the soldiers will be and what formation they will walk."
The Serbian leader also praised China’s contribution 
 in promoting the peaceful development in the 
 international community, adding that China now plays an 
 important role on the global stage and its rise benefits 
 the whole world.
He also said history should not be getting in the way 
 for cooperation between countries and Japan and Germany 
 should participate in China’s commemorating activities 
 for the 70th anniversary of the victory of WWII.
"What ended 70 years ago should be no obstacle to 
 today’s cooperation," he told Xinhua.
In addition, the Serbian president said he is very 
 pleased about the bilateral relations.
Though separated by thousands of miles, but the 
 friendship between the two peoples are profound.
The Serbian leader welcomed Chinese investment in his 
 country, saying Serbia has a customs-free market, 
 skilled workforce, among others.
"I would like the Chinese investors to build 
 factories and thereby make permanent link with Serbia.
"I think this is the best form of cooperation," he 
 said.
Currently, thanks to the "Belt and Road" initiative 
 put forward by Chinese President Xi Jinping, 
 China-Serbia relations have come to a new high, said 
 Nikolic.
"The idea about the new Silk Road has resulted in the 
 agreement concerning the Belgrade-Budapest railroad.
"President Xi and I had additional conversations 
 about this project and how Serbia could participate in 
 the investment this time," he said.
Serbian side is preparing for the leaders’ meeting of 
 China and Central and Eastern European countries which 
 is expected to take place in China later this year, 
 Nikolic said, noting that prime minister Alexsandar 
 Vucic will lead a delegation for the meeting.
In the end, the Serbian president expressed his 
 gratitude for China’s help during his country’s flood in 
 2014.
.
UN chief commends China’s role in world peace on eve 
 of V-Day parade
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
United Nations 
 Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon has commended China’s 
 contributions to world peace and security on the eve of 
 a grand military parade in the heart of Beijing to mark 
 the 70th anniversary of the end of Second World War.
"I am here to express my deep respect for all the 
 contributions that China has been making for world peace 
 and security," Ban said in Beijing on Wednesday night 
 during a meeting with Robin Li, the chairman and CEO of 
 China’s search engine giant Baidu.
"I am looking forward to participating in this very 
 important ceremony commemorating the 70th anniversary of 
 the end of WWII. It also coincides with the 70th 
 anniversary of the founding of the UN," said the 
 Secretary-General.
Last Friday, Ban made similar statements on China’s 
 contributions and sacrifice in WWII being recognized by 
 the international community, while taking a group 
 interview with UN-based Chinese media ahead of his China 
 trip from Sept 2 to 6.
During his 9th visit to China as UN chief, Ban will 
 attend the country’s V-Day celebrations together with 30 
 heads of state and government leaders that include 
 Russian President Vladimir Putin and the Republic of 
 Korea President Park Geun-hye.
The sacrifice of the Chinese people and their bravery 
 to restore freedom and security has been well recognized 
 by the world, Ban told Robin Li during a 30-minute 
 discussion on a wide range of global topics.
"China has become an indispensable member of the UN. 
 Without Chinese participation, it’s very difficult to 
 think that we can do our global things properly," Ban 
 said, stressing that China makes contributions not only 
 to peace and security, but also to development.
With the current Millennium Development Goals 
 expiring at the end of this year, Ban has been working 
 on a sustainable development agenda for the next 15 
 years.
A package of 17 sustainable development targets is 
 set to be adopted by member states at a special UN 
 summit later this month in New York.
"I count on strong engagement and leadership from 
 China," Ban said.
.
China pledges peace, cut of troops at WWII victory 
 commemoration
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
China will remain committed 
 to peaceful development, President Xi Jinping said on 
 Thursday, while announcing a cut of 300,000 troops from 
 the country’s military.
Xi made the remarks in his speech at the 
 commemoration of the 70th anniversary of the victory of 
 the Chinese People’s War of Resistance Against Japanese 
 Aggression and the World Anti-Fascist War.
"The People’s Liberation Army (PLA) of China is the 
 people’s army.
"All of its officers, men and women, must ... 
 faithfully fulfill the sacred duty of protecting the 
 nation’s security and people’s well-being, and carry out 
 the noble mission of upholding world peace," Xi said.
"No matter how much stronger it may become, China 
 will never seek hegemony or expansion.
"It will never inflict its past suffering on any 
 other nation," Xi said.
Excited to hear Xi’s speech, Cheng Lianchang, a 
 retired government official watching the celebration in 
 Tian’anmen Square, told Xinhua that he was impressed by 
 the troop cut.
"The cut in troops reflects China’s confidence in its 
 military strength and its wish for peace," Cheng said.
Xi stressed the aim of Thursday’s commemoration is to 
 keep history in mind, honor all those who laid down 
 their lives, cherish peace and open up the future.
Xi described the victory of the Chinese People’s War 
 of Resistance Against Japanese Aggression as "the first 
 complete victory won by China in its resistance against 
 foreign aggression in modern times."
The President stressed that the victory put an end to 
 China’s national humiliation after suffering successive 
 defeats at the hands of foreign aggressors in modern 
 times, and re-established China as a major country in 
 the world.
"This great triumph opened up bright prospects for 
 the great renewal of the Chinese nation and set our 
 ancient country on a new journey after gaining rebirth," 
 Xi said.
Xi noted that the Chinese People’s War of Resistance 
 Against Japanese Aggression and the World Anti-Fascist 
 War were a decisive battle between justice and evil, 
 between light and darkness, and between progress and 
 reaction.
"In defiance of aggression, the unyielding Chinese 
 people fought gallantly and finally won total victory 
 against the Japanese militarist aggressors ...
"This remarkable feat made by the Chinese nation was 
 rare in the history of war," Xi said.
Professor Qiao Liang, with the National Defense 
 University PLA China, told Xinhua that China learned a 
 tough lesson during WWII: without a strong army, a 
 country is prone to predation; Without the capacity to 
 stem war, historical tragedies are doomed to happen 
 again.
Ravaging through Asia, Europe, Africa and Oceania, 
 WWII inflicted more than 100 million military and 
 civilian casualties.
According to Xi, the Chinese people made huge 
 sacrifices holding their ground in the main Eastern 
 theater during the World Anti-Fascist War, while 
 receiving extensive support from the international 
 community.
Nearly 1,000 foreign troops from 17 countries 
 participated in the military parade Thursday, a key part 
 of the commemoration, together with about 12,000 Chinese 
 servicemen and women.
Qiao said the participation of foreign armies will 
 remind people that WWII victory was won through the 
 efforts and sacrifice of many countries.
"The Chinese people will always remember what the 
 people of other countries did for the victory of their 
 War of Resistance," Xi said, adding that the experience 
 of war makes people "value peace all the more."
According to Xi, the best way to honor the heroes who 
 gave their lives to uphold freedom, justice and peace 
 and mourn the loss of innocent lives brutally taken 
 during the war is to make sure that this historical 
 tragedy will never repeat itself.
"Seven decades ago, peace-loving countries across the 
 world joined forces in the fight against fascism and 
 achieved victory.
"Today, it also needs the joint efforts of all people 
 to safeguard justice and peace," Qiao said.
"A commemoration is totally worth it if the aim of 
 showcasing our military power is to safeguard justice 
 and peace," he added.
Major General Lyu Yueguang, present at the parade, 
 told Xinhua that the commemoration helps boost Chinese 
 people’s morale, especially as the country’s 
 comprehensive reform drive has entered a crucial stage.
Warning that the world is far from tranquil, Xi 
 called for a global community of shared future.
"In the interest of peace, we need to foster a keen 
 sense of a global community of shared future," Xi said.
"Prejudice, discrimination, hatred and war can only 
 cause disaster and suffering, while mutual respect, 
 equality, peaceful development and common prosperity 
 represent the right path to take."
.
In remembering war heroes, China highlights CPC’s 
 role in WWII victory
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Toting rifles, ten 
 formations of goose-stepping troops marched past the Tian’anmen Rostrum on Thursday morning, rekindling the 
 glorious past of forces led by the Communist Party of 
 China (CPC) in defeating Japanese invaders in World War 
 II.
All the ten formations were named after the most 
 famous counter-Japanese army units.
The mainstay role of the CPC and its forces is the 
 linchpin in defeating the Japanese militarism, said Gao 
 Yongzhong, a researcher with the Party History Research 
 Center of the CPC Central Committee, citing a conclusion 
 first proposed by CPC wartime leader Mao Zedong.
Chinese historians’ research showed that CPC-led 
 forces pinned down 60 percent of the invading Japanese 
 army at the backstage battlefield, killing some 527,000 
 Japanese troops.
The 70 banners they were holding may offer a glimpse 
 to the hardship and bloody fighting the troops had 
 endured at that time—"Five heroes of Mount Langya" was 
 in memory of the five heroes who jumped off a cliff near 
 Yixian County in Hebei Province in September 1941 after 
 successfully stalling an enemy offensive but were later 
 encircled by Japanese troops.
The story of the five heroes was so inspiring that it 
 even got included in the textbooks of Chinese primary 
 school students.
Another banner was in honor of a heroic company who 
 used bayonets to repulse an enemy attack in 
 "Hundred-Regiment Campaign," a massive, morale-boosting 
 offensive by more than 100 Communist-led regiments 
 against Japanese troops in 1940.
Statistics show that the campaign killed or injured 
 20,645 Japanese troops and 5,155 collaborationist 
 troops, dealing a heavy blow to the military strategy of 
 the Japanese army.
Lu Shaoze, a military official from the office 
 organizing the parade, said the names of the ten 
 representative formations were singled out from more 
 than 700 CPC-led wartime army units above the regiment 
 rank.
"All of them are principal forces in the nationwide 
 resistance."
Other heroic armies on display include 
 counter-Japanese forces with roots in the Eighth Route 
 Army, the New Fourth Army, Northeast United Resistance 
 Army and Southern China People’s Counter-Japanese 
 Guerrilla Force.
Gao also said that Kuomintang played an "important 
 role" in the war but noted it was the CPC that first 
 started resistance against the Japanese militarism in 
 1931, helped establish the united front against Japanese 
 aggression and unleashed the power of the people, after 
 Kuomintang-led troops suffered major losses.
According to Gao, "On Protracted War," a 1938 
 treatise by Mao Zedong in which he called for a 
 protracted people’s war to foil Japan’s quick-win 
 strategy, helped guide the Chinese win the war.
Some newly declassified files stored in U.S. National 
 Archives and Records Administration and other various 
 military archives also show CPC’s contribution to the 
 World Anti-Fascist War.
In a report wrote by Evans Carlson, who was the first 
 U.S. military officer entering the CPC-led 
 counter-Japanese base area, he said the Chinese people 
 displayed a new and exceptional nationalism, and leaders 
 of the Eighth Route Army developed very effective 
 guerilla warfare tactics.
Evans noted that the Japanese infantry troops were 
 usually at a loss in dealing with guerilla tactics that 
 couldn’t be found in their military textbooks.
It is irrefutable that CPC and CPC-led forces led the 
 Chinese nation to win the war and pushed for social 
 development, said Qin Li from the National Defense 
 University of the People’s Liberation Army (PLA).
But still, the foot formations and the banners can 
 only represent a fraction of China’s sacrifice in the 
 war.
Chinese archives revealed that in the eight years 
 from 1937, allied forces killed and wounded about 1.95 
 million Japanese soldiers.
About 70 per cent of these casualties took place in 
 the Chinese battlefield.
During the 14-year Japanese invasion of China, the 
 Chinese suffered more than 35 million military and 
 civilian casualties, accounting for a third of the total 
 casualties of all the countries in World War II.
"Victory in the war was a result of the efforts of 
 the whole nation and it can’t be enjoyed alone by any 
 single political force," said Gao.
The active units’ presence in the parade is in honor 
 of the bravery of their predecessors and show that 
 determination to safeguard national sovereignty and 
 security has passed to later generations, said Qu Rui, 
 deputy chief of the Operation Department of the PLA 
 General Staff Headquarters.
.
Respect for history, love for peace shining in China 
 V-Day parade: U.S. expert
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Respect for history, love 
 for peace will sparkle China’s upcoming V-Day parade, 
 which is to demonstrate an independent, self-reliant and 
 confident China, said U.S. author and expert on China 
 Robert Kuhn in an interview with Xinhua.
As a major event of China’s commemoration of the 70th 
 anniversary of the end of World War II (WWII), a 
 military parade featuring tanks, missiles and more than 
 12,000 troops will take place on Thursday morning in 
 Beijing.
Before the grand event, Kuhn, who is also the 
 chairman of the Kuhn Foundation, pointed out that 
 reflecting upon the WWII history is one of the most 
 important purposes of the military parade.
"The parade is for the 70th anniversary of the 
 victory of Allied forces against Japanese aggression, 
 which was one of the most terrible and oppressive 
 invasions and wars in human history.
"The Second World War in all aspects was very 
 vicious, so it’s important for the world to reflect on 
 that and to make sure it doesn’t happen again in any 
 form," Kuhn said.
The parade will help the world recognizes China’s 
 important role in the World Anti-Fascist War history and 
 make a strong statement that China will never allow what 
 happened during WWII and the Chinese People’s War of 
 Resistance Against Japanese Aggression to happen again, 
 Kuhn said.
Taking Israel’s response to the suffering of Jews 
 during WWII as a comparison, Kuhn said the country had 
 made the same statement as China.
"They have made the same statement in the world that 
 they will never allow what happened to the Jews, their 
 fellow countrymen, in Europe, Nazi Germany, ever to 
 happen again," Kuhn said, adding that he used the 
 analogy because it can give Westerners a better 
 understanding of how China feels.
During the Chinese People’s War of Resistance Against 
 Japanese Aggression, China suffered a total of 35 
 million military and non-military casualties, accounting 
 for a third of the total casualties of all the countries 
 involved in WWII.
"The parade is making a strong statement that China 
 is different today than it was in the past," Kuhn said. 
 "China is self-reliant and it has an independent 
 military capability to develop on its own. It’s openly 
 showing that it’s not a hidden thing."
The military parade is also "in a sense a celebration 
 of China’s emergence in the world in a very strong way," 
 he said. "It may be a symbol of China’s strength. But 
 not just military strength, also its independence and 
 self-confidence."
.
China’s V-Day parade underscores resolve to pursue 
 peaceful development
BEIJING China (Xinhua) -- The spectacular military 
 parade China that is to be staged here Thursday carries 
 many messages, yet all of them hail from one basic 
 point: Beijing is steadfast in pursuing peaceful 
 development.
Since China announced its plan to hold a military 
 parade to mark the 70th anniversary of its World War II 
 victory, wild speculations have emerged like that 
 China’s primary purpose is to flex its muscles at a time 
 of heightened tensions in the South China Sea and with 
 neighboring Japan.
China has announced straightforward that the parade 
 would showcase its advanced tanks, aircraft, missiles 
 and other military equipment, but it is hasty and 
 unfounded to conclude that it is aimed at intimidating 
 any other country.
Skeptics should be reminded that it is a long-running 
 tradition for countries around the world to put their 
 latest hi-tech armament on display at military parades.
As for the claim that China intends the event as a 
 saber-rattling occasion to instill fear, it is nothing 
 but nonsense since China has always insisted on 
 resolving disputes via peaceful means and made various 
 tension-mitigating initiatives.
The Chinese military has indeed witnessed rapid 
 growth of its capabilities in recent years.
However, China’s newly-gained military might is no 
 reason for alarm.
China follows a defense policy that is defensive in 
 nature; it promises in its defense white papers not to 
 strike first.
The Chinese military is also a front-runner in global 
 peace-keeping and humanitarian missions.
China, together with many other developing nations, 
 has benefited from the largely peaceful international 
 environment in the past few decades, and now the 
 country, resolute in building a moderately prosperous 
 society by 2020, needs a peaceful environment all the 
 more.
A bitter lesson that China learnt from the 14 years 
 of suffering under Japanese invasion is that peace is 
 not to be taken for granted. Peace can be secured only 
 when one is strong enough to defend oneself.
Therefore, although the Tian’anmen parade is indeed a 
 powerful demonstration of China’s military development, 
 the roaring jets and rumbling tanks are not meant to 
 make any other country feel threatened.
Instead, they are telling the world loud and clear 
 that China cherishes peace and its military power serves 
 as an effective guarantee of it.
.
The powerful message on peace from China’s V-Day 
 parade
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
China, which won the war in 
 the major oriental theater of the WWII, will stage 
 Thursday an eye-catching military parade in the heart of 
 its capital and in the presence of 30 heads of state and 
 government leaders to mark the anniversary.
The scale of the grand ceremony, with a total of 
 12,000 troops and 500 pieces of military equipment to 
 march through the Tian’anmen Square and nearly 200 
 aircraft to fly overhead in formations, has stirred up 
 wild speculations, from a rising power wanting to flex 
 its muscles to fortify its sphere of influence to 
 Beijing fanning a smoldering antipathy toward Japan.
The speculations are half-baked and a slip back into 
 the Cold War mentality, taken into considerations of 
 when and how China has chosen to stage the parade.
China has never before held such an event since the 
 end of the WWII in 1945, while similar commemorative 
 events were seen across Europe, which bore the impact of 
 invasions by Nazi Germany during the war.
China intended the grandness for the anniversary 
 marking the end of the most widespread and deadliest war 
 in history that lasted for almost a decade and caused 
 hundreds of millions of casualties, including 35 million 
 Chinese.
"The parade is the 70th anniversary of the victory of 
 allied forces against Japanese aggression, which was one 
 of the most terrible and oppressive invasions and wars 
 in human history," said Robert Kuhn, chairman of the 
 Kuhn Foundation dedicated to promoting China-U.S. 
 relations.
The WWII in all aspects was very vicious, since it 
 ended with nuclear weapons.
It’s important for the world to reflect on that and 
 to make sure it doesn’t happen again in any form, he 
 told Xinhua in an exclusive interview with Xinhua before 
 the parade.
While reflecting upon history, honoring sacrifice and 
 paying tribute to heroism, the grand ceremony should 
 sound alarm for those attempting to distort and 
 manipulate the WWII history to serve their short-term 
 political interests.
It is important that people keep memories of the 
 terrible consequences of the war alive and see it as a 
 moral and political commitment to work for peace and 
 security worldwide, former German chancellor Gerhard 
 Schroeder has said in a written interview with Xinhua.
Speaking of Germany’s efforts to atone for its 
 wartime crimes, Schroeder, among foreign statesmen 
 invited to witness the military parade, noted that it 
 had taken decades for the German people to be able to 
 cope with its past.
"I think it is important for every country to shed 
 light on its history and question it in an open and 
 critical manner. And it is important to stand ready for 
 reconciliation and forgiveness," he said.
Beijing has intended to make the celebrations an 
 international event, instead of a ceremony marking its 
 own victories and sufferings, by inviting 1,000 foreign 
 troops from 17 countries to participate in its first 
 non-National Day military parade.
The presence of troops and leaders from various 
 countries and organizations including UN 
 Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon, in a festive atmosphere, 
 highlighted the spirits of solidarity and cooperation, 
 as well as a common aspiration for peace and 
 development.
In the spirit of cooperation, the Allied nations 
 defeated the Axis nations, putting and end to the WWII.
Such a spirit is more desirable than ever in today’s 
 world, where people are battling such global misfortunes 
 as regional conflicts, terrorism, economic hardships, as 
 well as environmental and ecological problems.
Besides, the parade and other ceremonies also brought 
 to light the Chinese people’s contributions to the 
 victory in the WWII, which has been significantly 
 underestimated until recently.
The Chinese people deserve credit for having faced 
 the threat alone in the early years of the war following 
 the beginning of overt Japanese aggression in 1931, said 
 Nikolay Samoylov, an East Asia expert at St. Petersburg 
 State University.
Chinese people’s role in defeating Fascism deserves 
 greater recognition, said Kazakh President Nursultan 
 Nazarbayev in an interview with Xinhua before departing 
 for China to attend the parade. China made unmeasurable 
 contributions to the Allied victory in the WWII, he 
 added.
China’s military parade symbolizes a sense of pride 
 and is a celebration for heroism and the older 
 generation’s remarkable feats, Nazarbayev said.
In a move to show confidence in national strength and 
 sincerity to safeguard world peace and stability, China 
 showcased its military sophistication by rolling out 27 
 armament formations.
Most of the weaponry and equipment has never been 
 shown to the public before.
"It’s an opportunity to manifest a country’s force 
 but also to show that it’s not bellicose.
In this parade, China will demonstrate the progress 
 it has made, and its strategy of peaceful development.
In a world of uncertainties, China’s vision of 
 building a multi-polar peaceful world is very 
 important," former French Prime Minister Jean-Pierre 
 Raffarin said.
However, the absence of some countries in Beijing, 
 including the United States and a few Western countries, 
 inspired such observation that two camps, one led by the 
 United States and the other led by Russia and China, has 
 appeared on the political landscape.
The remarks have gone too far and contradicted the 
 very essence of China’s V-Day parade.
Not to mention that in Europe, the style with which 
 Germany reconciled with its victims should set an 
 example for the reconciliation between Japan and its 
 Asian neighbors.
.
Chinese photographers race against time to capture 
 veteran soldiers
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
Carrying a bamboo basket on 
 his back, Wang Zhongqing saluted to the camera, the 
 little finger on his right hand deformed after decades 
 of toil.
Wang, a veteran soldier in northwest China’s Shaanxi 
 province, died earlier this year at the age of 90. But 
 his image lives on in a photo taken by photographer Chen 
 Xiaojun.
A photo exhibition, titled "Glory, Image: I Am a 
 Veteran Soldier", is being held at the National Science 
 Library. Opening last Sunday, it will last until October 
 7.
The 50 photos exhibited were selected from albums by 
 Chen Xiaojun and Ren Hui, who spent a year travelling 
 across China to take pictures of nearly 100 veteran 
 soldiers.
The idea of taking photos for veterans started more 
 than a year ago when Chen saw a notice seeking 
 photographers in Nanjing, capital of east China’s 
 Jiangsu province. Although he didn’t make the trip, the 
 notice inspired him.
"We need to race against time to preserve their 
 images."
He soon embarked on the journey to look for veteran 
 soldiers with his friend Ren Hui.
"He was an old man in dire need of help," Chen was 
 told by a volunteer from a veteran charity.
They then climbed over the mountains to reach Wang’s 
 shanty.
"We trudged for five or six kilometers on the winding 
 and muddy paths before finding him deep in the 
 mountains."
Wang was then at the terminal stage of nasopharyngeal 
 cancer and living in poverty.
"He carried eggs with a bamboo basket to go out of 
 the mountains every half a month, earning about 20 yuan 
 (3.1 U.S. dollars) in the market of a nearby township," 
 Chen said bitterly.
Deeply touched, he took a photo on the mountain road, 
 while Wang was saluting - perhaps for the last time in 
 his life.
Seven of the 50 veteran soldiers whose photos were on 
 exhibition have passed away, including Lu Shaochen, 93.
Lu was an interpreter who joined the army in 1943 and 
 fought in Burma.
According to his last request, his children will put 
 his portrait in front of the television Thursday 
 morning, assuming the man can watch the military parade 
 in heaven.
Most veteran soldiers—pilots, tank drivers, riflemen 
 and interpreters—were saluting in the photos, but there 
 are exceptions.
Dong Jimin, 111, joined the army in 1931, when 
 northeast China was taken by the Japanese.
In the photo, he is wearing a white shirt, his left 
 hand held close to the ear as if he was trying to hear 
 something.
Yang Qusai, 87, was sick in bed while his photo was 
 taken.
A driver, he regularly made trips on Burma Road, a 
 lifeline that linked the Chinese battlefield with allied 
 forces during World War II.
Zhao Zhenying, 98, witnessed the surrender of the 
 Japanese in Nanjing, then capital of China’s Nationalist 
 government.
He was head of a guard battalion during the ceremony. 
 In his photo he is wearing a T-shirt with the numbers 
 "1945-2015", behind him lay a photo of his deceased 
 wife.
Last month, Xue Gang, curator of the exhibition, took 
 Zhao to Chang’an Avenue where the anniversary parade 
 will take place. "Do you remember where were you 70 
 years ago?" Xue asked him.
Zhao thought for a while and shook his head. "I 
 forget," he murmured.
"Three years ago, Zhao could talk on and on about the 
 past," Xue recalls.
BEIJING China (Xinhua) --
China, which won the war in 
 the major oriental theater of the WWII, will stage 
 Thursday an eye-catching military parade in the heart of 
 its capital and in the presence of 30 heads of state and 
 government leaders to mark the anniversary.
The scale of the grand ceremony, with a total of 
 12,000 troops and 500 pieces of military equipment to 
 march through the Tian’anmen Square and nearly 200 
 aircraft to fly overhead in formations, has stirred up 
 wild speculations, from a rising power wanting to flex 
 its muscles to fortify its sphere of influence to 
 Beijing fanning a smoldering antipathy toward Japan.
The speculations are half-baked and a slip back into 
 the Cold War mentality, taken into considerations of 
 when and how China has chosen to stage the parade.
China has never before held such an event since the 
 end of the WWII in 1945, while similar commemorative 
 events were seen across Europe, which bore the impact of 
 invasions by Nazi Germany during the war.
China intended the grandness for the anniversary 
 marking the end of the most widespread and deadliest war 
 in history that lasted for almost a decade and caused 
 hundreds of millions of casualties, including 35 million 
 Chinese.
"The parade is the 70th anniversary of the victory of 
 allied forces against Japanese aggression, which was one 
 of the most terrible and oppressive invasions and wars 
 in human history," said Robert Kuhn, chairman of the 
 Kuhn Foundation dedicated to promoting China-U.S. 
 relations.
The WWII in all aspects was very vicious, since it 
 ended with nuclear weapons.
It’s important for the world to reflect on that and 
 to make sure it doesn’t happen again in any form, he 
 told Xinhua in an exclusive interview with Xinhua before 
 the parade.
While reflecting upon history, honoring sacrifice and 
 paying tribute to heroism, the grand ceremony should 
 sound alarm for those attempting to distort and 
 manipulate the WWII history to serve their short-term 
 political interests.
It is important that people keep memories of the 
 terrible consequences of the war alive and see it as a 
 moral and political commitment to work for peace and 
 security worldwide, former German chancellor Gerhard 
 Schroeder has said in a written interview with Xinhua.
Speaking of Germany’s efforts to atone for its 
 wartime crimes, Schroeder, among foreign statesmen 
 invited to witness the military parade, noted that it 
 had taken decades for the German people to be able to 
 cope with its past.
"I think it is important for every country to shed 
 light on its history and question it in an open and 
 critical manner.
"And it is important to stand ready for 
 reconciliation and forgiveness," he said.
Beijing has intended to make the celebrations an 
 international event, instead of a ceremony marking its 
 own victories and sufferings, by inviting 1,000 foreign 
 troops from 17 countries to participate in its first 
 non-National Day military parade.
The presence of troops and leaders from various 
 countries and organizations including UN 
 Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon, in a festive atmosphere, 
 highlighted the spirits of solidarity and cooperation, 
 as well as a common aspiration for peace and 
 development.
In the spirit of cooperation, the Allied nations 
 defeated the Axis nations, putting and end to the WWII. 
 Such a spirit is more desirable than ever in today’s 
 world, where people are battling such global misfortunes 
 as regional conflicts, terrorism, economic hardships, as 
 well as environmental and ecological problems.
Besides, the parade and other ceremonies also brought 
 to light the Chinese people’s contributions to the 
 victory in the WWII, which has been significantly 
 underestimated until recently.
The Chinese people deserve credit for having faced 
 the threat alone in the early years of the war following 
 the beginning of overt Japanese aggression in 1931, said 
 Nikolay Samoylov, an East Asia expert at St. Petersburg 
 State University.
Chinese people’s role in defeating Fascism deserves 
 greater recognition, said Kazakh President Nursultan 
 Nazarbayev in an interview with Xinhua before departing 
 for China to attend the parade.
China made unmeasurable contributions to the Allied 
 victory in the WWII, he added.
China’s military parade symbolizes a sense of pride 
 and is a celebration for heroism and the older 
 generation’s remarkable feats, Nazarbayev said.
In a move to show confidence in national strength and 
 sincerity to safeguard world peace and stability, China 
 showcased its military sophistication by rolling out 27 
 armament formations.
Most of the weaponry and equipment has never been 
 shown to the public before.
"It’s an opportunity to manifest a country’s force 
 but also to show that it’s not bellicose.
In this parade, China will demonstrate the progress 
 it has made, and its strategy of peaceful development.
"In a world of uncertainties, China’s vision of 
 building a multi-polar peaceful world is very 
 important," former French Prime Minister Jean-Pierre 
 Raffarin said.
However, the absence of some countries in Beijing, 
 including the United States and a few Western countries, 
 inspired such observation that two camps, one led by the 
 United States and the other led by Russia and China, has 
 appeared on the political landscape.
The remarks have gone too far and contradicted the 
 very essence of China’s V-Day parade.
Not to mention that in Europe, the style with which 
 Germany reconciled with its victims should set an 
 example for the reconciliation between Japan and its 
 Asian neighbors.
.
My father fought in Chinese People’s war against 
 Japanese aggression
By Stoszek Magdalena, Han Mei, Gao Fan WARSAW Poland 
 (Xinhua) -- Stanislaw Flato, a Polish doctor whose 
 Chinese name was Fu Lato, was an example of foreign 
 volunteers who extended helping hands to the Chinese 
 people in their fighting against Japanese aggression 
 during World War Two.
Flato the senior’s son, Jurek Flato who currently 
 lives in Stockholm, shared with Xinhua the memories of 
 his father’s life in China.
After graduated from a university in Paris in 1936, 
 he left for Spain, where joined the International 
 Brigades, which were dismissed few years later.
A group of around 20 doctors then organized 
 themselves and decided to join the Chinese people’s war 
 against Japanese aggression.
According to Jurek Flato, the majority of these 
 physicians were of Jewish origin, mostly from Poland and 
 Germany.
"They left on an English vessel and headed for Hong 
 Kong, where they were greeted by Song Qingling and 
 Israel Epstein. Firstly, they were sent to Chongqing.
"When they arrived, they were accommodated together 
 with the Chinese troops."
"During the first meal, before the newly arrived 
 doctors managed to understand how to eat correctly, the 
 food was already gone!
"By the second meal they have already learned to use 
 chopsticks and eat from the common bowls".
Once the doctors realized the difficulties and lack 
 of food, they decided to share their rates and eat the 
 same food as those dedicated for the patients.
The main task of doctors was to cure and treat the 
 wounds of soldiers, as well as diseases which were a 
 result of poor sanitary and hygienic conditions - both 
 within the army and within the civilians.
Jurek Flato said that many pictures of his father and 
 his co-workers are currently placed in the archives of 
 Beijing National Museum.
Afterwards, the group of doctors were relocated to 
 Guizhou province, where a commemorative stele and a 
 website dedicated to their contribution in Chinese 
 anti-fascist war have been created later.
Jurek Flato said that three sons of those doctors, 
 together with the authorities of Guiyang together, have 
 made an effort to gather the families of the doctors, 
 give them opportunity to visit this memorable place and 
 renovate the site.
Flato said that many of the families’ members, 
 including Jurek Flato’s sister, have been invited to 
 take part in the commemorations of the 70th anniversary 
 of the victory of the Chinese People’s war against 
 Japanese aggression and the world’s anti-Fascist war, 
 held in Beijing on Thursday.
Flato wondered whether the tragic experiences of the 
 WWII and other inhuman wars can teach humanity not to 
 use such extreme measures.
As the world is getting more and more informed and 
 well-educated, many countries from different parts of 
 the world cooperate with good results which might 
 contribute to sustaining peace, Flato said.
"I wish it can be like that," Flato added, wishing 
 that the mankind can learn from the past to value peace 
 all the more.
.
China’s war against Japan significant to WWII 
 victory: Cambridge professor
LONDON United Kingdom (Xinhua) --
China’s war of 
 resistance against Japanese aggression was very 
 important for the world to win the anti-Fascist war 70 
 years ago, and more and more Western experts attach 
 great significance to China’s contributions to World War 
 II (WWII) victory, a leading historian at Cambridge 
 University has said.
China’s war not only foiled Japan’s strategy to 
 dominate Asia and its ambition to establish a Japan-led 
 East Asian order, but also helped end Western countries’ 
 imperialism in the region, Hans van de Ven, a history 
 professor and director of the College of Asian and 
 Middle Eastern Studies at Cambridge University, told 
 Xinhua in a recent interview.
Van de Ven, one of the renowned Western scholars 
 intrigued by China’s resistance against Japan, is also a 
 forerunner in studying the military aspect of the 
 history.
"So many history books about WWII mainly came from 
 American and British historians, who played down China’s 
 role in WWII.
"They think that the United States launched 
 offensives against Japan across the Pacific to win the 
 war and China had little to do with the victory.
"So it’s not difficult to understand why they hold 
 that China’s war against Japan was insignificant to the 
 world," he said.
"However, such an understanding of China’s role in 
 WWII is unfair and incorrect.
In his book "War and Nationalism in China 
 (1925-1945)," Van de Ven dwells on details of China’s 
 resistance, as well as the roles played by the country’s 
 Nationalists and Communists in the war.
In his opinion, the fact that China’s war of 
 resistance was largely ignored by the West has much to 
 do with the Western assessments of China’s pursuit of 
 the war.
Despite China’s contribution to WWII, van de Ven 
 noted, the war efforts of the Chinese troops had not 
 been taken seriously by the allies.
"China is a serious and major component of the Second 
 World War" and its role in the conflict needs to be 
 "reassessed," he said.
"The Chinese people’s suffering, injuries, torture 
 and sacrifice during the war of resistance against 
 Japanese aggression were much different from those of 
 other countries, and cannot be assessed just in the 
 Western historical perspective and values," stressed the 
 scholar.
"Western historians used to evaluate China’s role in 
 WWII from the U.S.-dominated view of history.
"My suggestion is that we must study the war history 
 from China’s perspective and angle," he said.
"Actually, 
 the biggest change in global assessment of China’s role 
 in WWII is that more and more Western experts and 
 scholars begin to recognize China’s war of resistance 
 against Japanese aggression as a vital turning point in 
 the Chinese history, and more and more people turn to 
 analyze this war."
"On the one hand, we urge that the Western academic 
 circles must rethink and revalue China’s history and 
 contribution during the war.
"On the other hand, we also hope that China finds its 
 own characteristics and special circumstances in the 
 history," said the professor.
Meanwhile, the victory of China’s war of resistance 
 against Japanese aggression also laid a solid foundation 
 for the Communist Party of China to win the subsequent 
 civil war and set up the new China.
If there were not the victory of the war of 
 resistance against Japanese aggression, it would be 
 impossible to establish a new China, he added.
.
Los Angeles hosts photo exhibition on U.S.-China 
 collaboration during WWII
LOS ANGELES United States (Xinhua) -- 
 More than 30 
 historical photos featuring the collaboration between 
 China and the United States during World War II (WWII) 
 were exhibited at the Los Angeles city hall Tuesday.
"The stories captured in these photographs remind us 
 of the common humanity that unites our two nations," Los 
 Angeles Mayor Eric Garcetti, who was not able to attend 
 the opening ceremony of the exhibition Tuesday, said in 
 a message delivered by Deputy Mayor Jeff Gorell.
The exhibition was co-organized by the Chinese 
 Consulate-General in Los Angeles and the Office of Mayor 
 Garcetti, and supported by the China Overseas Exchange 
 Association.
This year marks the 70th anniversary of the end of 
 World War II.
"The exhibition is a chance to recall the common 
 cause that bound together two great Pacific nations: the 
 U.S. and China.
"Serving side by side, the two nations forged 
 legendary friendships that transcended race, language 
 and culture ...
"The exhibition celebrates those collective memories 
 that today continue to inspire collaboration and peace," 
 the mayor’s office said in a statement.
The photos displayed were taken by the U.S. 164th 
 Signal Photo Company during the war, highlighting 
 renowned historical figures such as General Joseph 
 Stilwell, General Claire Lee Chennault of the American 
 Flying Tigers, and top Chinese leaders.
They also showcased images of soldiers, medics and 
 civilians, the many unsung heroes from both countries 
 who were united in a valiant cause.
"The precious old photos bring us vivid memories of 
 the war and render us a direct knowledge and perception 
 of history and significance of the China-U.S. 
 cooperation," said Chinese Consulate General Liu Jian at 
 the ceremony attended by dozens of Los Angeles and 
 Chinese officials and representatives from different 
 organizations.
"In memory of the young men and women who sacrificed 
 their lives for peace and justice, the photos call upon 
 us not only to stand vigil for peace and defend the 
 achievements of WWII, but also to pass on the legacy to 
 the future by building upon what we have achieved in the 
 China-U.S. cooperation with a positive attitude and 
 tangible actions," Liu said.
"When you see people were working together, remember 
 that we were together to fight," Gail Soffer, who 
 visited the exhibition, told Xinhua.
"In the future, the world nations need to do more 
 cooperations, especially these days in the fighting 
 against greenhouse gases, global warming and other 
 environmental problems.
It will be a good idea for us to get along better," 
 she added.
.
Chinese embassy in Germany marks 70th anniversary of 
 WWII victory
BERLIN Germany (Xinhua) -- Overseas Chinese and 
 German guests have marked here on Thursday the 70th 
 anniversary of the victory of Chinese People’s War of 
 Resistance Against Japanese Aggression and the World 
 Anti-Fascist War.
Overseas Chinese and students as well as German 
 guests took part in a series of commemorative activities 
 held in the Chinese embassy in Germany.
They watched together the military parade in Beijing, 
 which was held earlier in the day in Tian’anmen Square 
 to celebrate the 70th anniversary of the WWII victory.
Juergen Heiducoff, a retired German officer, told 
 Xinhua that Chinese President Xi Jinping has sent a 
 signal of harmony, cooperation and peace to the world in 
 his address at the commemoration in Beijing.
"I once took part in a parade in Berlin, and I know 
 how complicate and difficult it is.
"The parade in Beijing is a masterly military 
 performance," Heiducoff said.
Addressing a following panel discussion, Chinese 
 Ambassador to Germany Shi Mingde said the tenacious 
 fight of the Chinese people against Japan during the 
 WWII played a decisive role in completely defeating the 
 Japanese aggressors;
In addition, China made an indelible contribution to 
 the war victory by supporting and acting in concert with 
 its allies in their fight in Europe and in the Pacific 
 theater.
"My impression is that very few people in the West 
 know about the war history in Asia during WWII," Shi 
 noted.
He expressed hope that people in Germany and other 
 western countries could learn more about this part of 
 history, which helps people get a better and objective 
 understanding of China.
It caused 35 million casualties in China alone," said 
 Rolf Berthold, Ambassador of East Germany to China from 
 1982 to 1990.
He made a report on China’s role in the WWII, with a 
 focus on Japan’s aggression and the fight of Chinese 
 people against Japanese fascists.
The former ambassador noted that China’s 
 anti-Japanese invasion war, which was not mentioned in 
 many publications on the WWII, was an important part of 
 the World Anti-fascism War.
"Learning about the history happened in Asia and 
 China’s war against the Japanese aggression helps people 
 develop a better and more correct understanding of the 
 Second World War," he added.
Besides, experts from China and Germany have also 
 discussed topics including the contribution made by 
 people of other countries for China’s victory over Japan 
 as well as Germany’s dealing with its Nazi-past after 
 the end of the WWII.
.
Brave group of 
 Nanking scholars became Guardians of China’s culture
by Xinhua writer Ji Shaoting NANJING China (Xinhua) 
 -- In 1937, Japanese troops were moving through China, 
 killing, destroying and looting, in a campaign to crush 
 the nation into brutal subjugation.
As the invaders approached Nanjing city, then the 
 capital of the country, a brave group of scholars at the 
 University of Nanking hurried to save a wealth of relics 
 from thousands of years of Chinese civilization.
In their retreat to a remote village in southwest 
 China’s Sichuan Province, they took thousands of 
 historic items in a bid to preserve their culture.
These included rubbings from stone carvings and other 
 inscriptions, which are now being published in a series 
 of books.
"The culture they protected is what made the Chinese 
 people Chinese," says Zhang Sheng, head of the School of 
 History of Nanjing University in Nanjing, capital of 
 east China’s Jiangsu Province.
"The Japanese knew the power of Chinese culture, 
 which is why they tried to destroy the things that 
 united our people."
This year, the university published a book of the 
 first 200 rubbings.
More books are planned as researchers deepen their 
 understanding of the collection stored in the School of 
 History, along with 2,000 other cultural relics.
The collection of rubbings originated chiefly from 
 the Chinese Culture Institute of the University of 
 Nanking, one of the two forebears of the present day 
 Nanjing University.
The University of Nanking was founded in 1888 as a 
 merger of Nanking University, Union Christian College 
 and Nanking Christian College.
The university established its Chinese Culture 
 Institute (CCI) in 1930, with the express mission to 
 study, protect and promote the country’s threatened 
 culture.
While modern archeology was established in China at 
 the time, it had little influence on the study of 
 history and culture, so an important part of CCI’s work 
 was the collection, cataloging and research of cultural 
 relics.
In 1934, Nanking University’s Canadian founder John 
 Calvin Ferguson donated his entire collection of relics, 
 accumulated over 40 years in China, to CCI.
These rare treasures included stele inscriptions, 
 rubbings, and a work on calligraphy by Wang Youjun, 
 carved during the Song Dynasty (960 - 1279).
The CCI’s ambitions were extravagant when many people 
 were struggling to feed themselves, Zhang says.
After all-out war against the Japanese invasion broke 
 out on July 7, 1937, Japanese forces advanced swiftly. 
 In August, Shanghai fell and Japanese aircraft began to 
 bomb Nanjing.
The university - as an American missionary 
 institution - was theoretically neutral.
However, the situation deteriorated so much that 
 teaching stopped on Nov. 18 and the university staff 
 began to secure trucks and vessels to move a few days 
 later, says Zhang.
The first evacuation of faculty and students, led by 
 Qiu Jiakui, Sun Mingjing and others, headed to Chengdu, 
 taking furniture, utensils and the rubbings.
"This was the only thing they could do," Zhang says.
In March 1938, the University of Nanking reopened at 
 Huaxiba, Chengdu.
During the relocation, Shang Chengzuo heard of relics 
 being unearthed in Changsha.
Later he returned while Japanese troops were 
 besieging the city and rescued another 155 items.
The relics Shang saved from the Japanese bombardment 
 are now treasures of the university museum, Zhang says.
Other scholars observed the Yi nationality in Sichuan 
 Province, and traveled deep into western China to 
 collect relics and take photos.
They returned with studies of stone and stele 
 inscriptions, cliff tombs, watchtower gates of the Han 
 Dynasty (206 BC - 220), and decorative patterns on Han 
 bricks.
They took photos, made rubbings and collected ancient 
 rubbings for the purposes of comparison.
CCI scholars gathered an estimated 2,680 rubbings and 
 other relics in China’s west during the eight years of 
 war.
Carefully unfolding rubbings of a work by Huang 
 Tingjian, a calligrapher and poet of the Northern Song 
 Dynasty, Shui Tao, head of the Art and Archaeology 
 Museum of Nanjing University, explains why they are 
 treasured.
"The rubbings have three values: the value of the 
 calligraphy; the value of the historical content; and 
 the value of the poetry," Shui says.
"We can clearly see the calligraphy style changed 
 over time."
Ranging from the Qin Dynasty (221 BC - 207 BC) to 
 Qing Dynasty (1644-1912), some of them involve the most 
 famous figures in China’s history, he adds.
Most of the rubbings are complete. "Some rubbing 
 makers in the old times had bad habits.
"They would break parts of the stone tablets after 
 they made their rubbings to make them more precious," he 
 says.
Some of them are history’s only archive after the 
 original stone carvings were lost or destroyed.
Shui shows a rubbing of the famed eight-horse 
 embossment from the Tang Dynasty (618 - 907).
Several rubbings were made to be composed for the 
 complete image.
The city of Nanjing still bears the scars of the 
 Nanjing Massacre, when Japanese troops killed 300,000 
 people in a six-week campaign of terror.
Skeletal remains are still visible in an underground 
 chamber beneath the memorial hall, and an old house 
 inside Nanjing University campus was the home of German 
 businessman John Rabe who protected more than 600 
 Chinese during the massacre.
From horrors of the war, Nanjing University rose to 
 become one of China’s most prestigious universities.
Its School of History has a worldwide reputation, 
 especially in the study of the Chinese People’s War of 
 Resistance Against Japanese Aggression.
Hundreds of books in the university museum are 
 testament to the dedication of its outstanding 
 scholarship over the decades.
The publication of the first book of precious 
 rubbings signals the continuity of Chinese culture, says 
 Shui:
The full set of books will require a lot of work and 
 money.
The remains of poems and sculptures are now housed in 
 three-storied buildings more than a century old, where 
 creepers climb the walls and cicadas chirrup from the 
 trees shadowing over them.
The rubbings are cataloged, labeled in camphorwood 
 cabinets, shielded from bugs and humidity.
Renowned historian Zhang Xianwen, 81, used to sneak 
 into the room where the historic books and relics were 
 stored after the faculty returned to Nanjing.
"This was my secret treasure house," Zhang recalls. 
 As a young teacher, finding "interesting things" among 
 the uncatalogued artifacts was his great pleasure.
"It is hard to quantify how much the older generation 
 saved for us during the evacuation to Sichuan.
"It is clear that without their efforts, the spirit 
 of the Chinese people might be different," he says.
"Without the culture they protected, people here 
 would only remember the killing and blood of the war."
.



 China rejects Japan comments over Beijing visit of Ban 
 Ki-moon



 China confirms official prisoner amnesty to mark war 
 anniversary



 Exhibition of Russian WWII anti-Fascist archives opens 
 in Beijing
MOMBASA - GULSHAN JIVRAJ, Mobile: 0722 775164 Tel: (+254) (41) 2230130 / 

Wireless: 020 3549187
e-mail: info@coastweek.com
NAIROBI - ANJUM H. ASODIA, Mobile: 0733 775446 Tel: (+254) (020) 3744459
e-mail: anjum@asodia.co.ke